Ochrona danych i polityka prywatności
Wprowadzenie
Słowniczek pojęć
Kto jest administratorem Twoich danych?
W jakim celu i jak długo będziemy przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe?
Skąd pozyskujemy Twoje dane osobowe?
Jakie kategorie Twoich danych osobowych przetwarzamy?
Komu Twoje dane mogą być ujawniane?
Jakie są Twoje prawa?
Czy Goodie podejmuje decyzje w sposób zautomatyzowany?
Pliki do pobrania
Zasady ochrony prywatności
Pliki cookie i podobne technologie
Zaufani Partnerzy
Szczegółowa lista odbiorców danych osobowych w podziale na kategorie
Wprowadzenie
Od 25 maja 2018 r. obowiązują nowe przepisy w sprawie ochrony danych osobowych, znane powszechnie jako RODO. Głównym celem RODO jest ujednolicenie zasad przetwarzania danych osobowych na terenie całej Unii Europejskiej. Millennium Goodie Sp. z o. o. przetwarza Twoje dane m.in. w celu zawarcia umowy, korzystania z Platformy, w tym obsługi programów lojalnościowych i dostarczania najlepszych okazji i usług, dopasowanych do Twoich preferencji i zainteresowań, a także by informować o nowych usługach i dostępnych funkcjach.
Informacja na tej stronie dotyczy użytkowników Platformy Goodie. Aby zapoznać się z informacją dotyczącą osób
pozostających w innej relacji z Goodie, wybierz jeden z poniższych odnośników:
Pracownik Partnera lub Najemcy
Partner lub Najemca będący
osobą fizyczną prowadzącą jednoosobową działalnością gospodarczą lub będący wspólnikiem spółki
cywilnej
Kandydat do pracy w Goodie
Pracownik Goodie
Osoba zatrudniona na
umowę zlecenie, umowę o dzieło, praktykant
Na tej stronie dowiesz się:
jakie dane użytkowników Goodie przetwarzamy i w jakim celu
kto czuwa nad prawidłowym przetwarzaniem danych w Goodie
jakim podmiotom dane mogą być udostępnione
jakie są Twoje prawa i obowiązki Goodie
w jaki sposób zarządzisz swoimi zgodami
Słowniczek pojęć dotyczących ochrony danych
Dane osobowe
– Informacje o zidentyfikowanej lub możliwej do zidentyfikowania osobie fizycznej.
Przetwarzanie
– To operacje wykonywane na danych osobowych, np. zbieranie, utrwalanie, przechowywanie,
opracowywanie, zmienianie, udostępnianie i usuwanie danych itp.
Administrator
– Osoba lub firma, która ustala po co (dlaczego) i w jaki sposób Twoje dane osobowe będą
przetwarzane.
Podmiot przetwarzający
– Osoba, urząd, instytucja lub firma, która przetwarza dane osobowe w imieniu
administratora.
Profilowanie
– Zautomatyzowane przetwarzanie danych, dzięki któremu możemy zaproponować Ci oferty
pasujące do Twoich potrzeb i możliwości.
Zasady przetwarzania danych osobowych
Informacje ogólne dotyczące przetwarzania danych osobowych
Poniżej znajdziesz szczegółowe zasady dotyczące przetwarzania Twoich danych osobowych w Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o. Dowiesz się m.in. dla jakich celów i jak długo Goodie przetwarza lub będzie przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe. Poznasz kategorie podmiotów które mogą mieć dostęp do Twoich danych osobowych, a także z jakich praw możesz skorzystać w związku z przetwarzaniem Twoich danych osobowych. Zakres przekazywanych informacji odpowiada wymogom wynikającym z unijnych przepisów o ochronie danych osobowych tj. Rozporządzenia Parlamentu Europejskiego i Rady (UE) 2016/679, zwanego także ogólnym rozporządzeniem o ochronie danych.
Kto jest administratorem Twoich danych?
Administratorem Twoich danych w ramach usług oferowanych przez nas jest Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o. z siedzibą w Warszawie. Goodie – jako administrator danych – dołoży wszelkich starań, aby w jak najpełniejszym stopniu zrealizować wymogi Rozporządzenia i w ten sposób chronić Twoje dane osobowe.
adres: ul. Stanisława Żaryna 2A, 02-593 Warszawa,
e-mail: kontakt@goodie.pl
Nadzór nad prawidłowym przetwarzaniem Twoich danych osobowych w Goodie sprawuje Inspektor Ochrony Danych (dalej „Inspektor”). Możesz kontaktować się z Inspektorem we wszystkich sprawach związanych z przetwarzaniem Twoich danych osobowych, także w razie wątpliwości co do Twoich praw.
adres: Inspektor Ochrony Danych, Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o., ul. Stanisława Żaryna 2A, 02-593 Warszawa.
e-mail: iod@goodie.pl
W jakim celu i jak długo będziemy przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe?
Goodie gwarantuje, że będzie przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe wyłącznie w konkretnych, wyraźnych i prawnie uzasadnionych celach i nie przetwarza ich dalej w sposób niezgodny z tymi celami. Cel przetwarzania danych to powód, dla którego przetwarzamy Twoje dane osobowe. Jeżeli Goodie będzie chciało przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe dla innych celów – niewskazanych poniżej – zostaniesz wtedy odrębnie poinformowany o tym nowym celu.Poniższe sekcje przedstawiają cele przetwarzania danych. Każdy z poniższych celów został dokładnie oceniony przez Goodie pod kątem zgodności z przepisami Rozporządzenia oraz przepisami regulującymi działalność Goodie. Regularnie weryfikujemy bazy danych i usuwamy zbędne informacje.
Przedstawione poniżej informacje za każdym razem wskazują cel przetwarzania danych i jego właściwą podstawę
prawną. Twoje dane osobowe będą przechowywane przez czas odpowiedni do realizacji wskazanych celów. Nie
przechowujemy Twoich danych dłużej niż to konieczne.
Poniżej sprawdzisz cele, w jakich przetwarzamy Twoje dane:
Zawarcie, należyte wykonanie, rozwiązanie umowy lub inne czynności niezbędne do realizacji zawartej z Tobą umowy
Wyjaśnienie
Chodzi tu o wszelkie czynności w celu przygotowania do zawarcia, realizacji lub rozwiązania umowy, a także
wykonania innych czynności prawnych związanych z umową.
Podstawa prawna
Rozporządzenie, art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b)
Długość okresu przetwarzania danych
Do zakończenia wszystkich czynności poprzedzających zawarcie umowy z Goodie, a w przypadku zawarcia umowy
do czasu jej zakończenia.
Zarówno w trakcie trwania tego okresu, jak również po jego zakończeniu Goodie może przetwarzać dane osobowe
w oparciu o inne wskazane poniżej cele i podstawy prawne (np. w celach rachunkowych, podatkowych czy przez
właściwy okres zabezpieczenia ewentualnych roszczeń – w sytuacjach, w których będzie miało to zastosowanie).
Marketing produktów i usług Goodie
Wyjaśnienie
Chodzi tu o marketing Goodie w szczególności realizowany poprzez przekazywanie, wyświetlanie lub przesyłanie informacji handlowych, w tym w przypadku uzyskania stosownej zgody, poprzez urządzenia komunikacji elektronicznej lub telefonicznej. Marketing może być realizowany także w oparciu o profilowanie, które oznacza przetwarzanie w celach marketingowych informacji uwzględniających cechy, zachowania lub preferencje Użytkownika. Wykorzystując profilowanie Goodie może na podstawie dotychczasowej współpracy dostosować kierowane do Ciebie oferty handlowe do Twoich zainteresowań i potrzeb.
Podstawa prawna
Rozporządzenie, art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f)
Długość okresu przetwarzania danych
Do czasu wypełnienia prawnie uzasadnionego interesu Goodie, stanowiącego podstawę tego przetwarzania lub wniesienia skutecznego sprzeciwu wobec takiego przetwarzania. Przetwarzanie trwa nie dłużej niż do końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym upływa właściwy termin przedawnienia roszczenia.
Realizacja działań prowadzonych na podstawie udzielonych zgód
Wyjaśnienie
Jest to np. marketing usług i produktów firm współpracujących z Goodie. W każdym przypadku zbierana od Ciebie zgoda będzie wskazywała m.in. cel przetwarzania danych, który chcemy w oparciu o tą zgodę realizować. Ww. marketing może być realizowany także w oparciu o profilowanie, które oznacza przetwarzanie w celach marketingowych informacji uwzględniających cechy, zachowania lub preferencje Użytkownika. Wykorzystując profilowanie Goodie może na podstawie dotychczasowej współpracy dostosować kierowane do Ciebie oferty handlowe do Twoich zainteresowań i potrzeb.
Podstawa prawna
Rozporządzenie, art. 6 ust. 1 lit. a)
Długość okresu przetwarzania danych
Do czasu wycofania udzielonych zgód.
Realizacja komunikacji lub dostarczania usług za pośrednictwem Platformy Goodie, w tym rozpatrywanie reklamacji
Wyjaśnienie
W ramach wskazanego celu będziemy przetwarzać Twoje dane także po to, aby umożliwić komunikację lub dostarczanie usług za pośrednictwem Platformy Goodie. W tym w zakresie przetwarzane będą m.in. identyfikatory, jak adres IP urządzenia lub informacje geolokalizacyjne.
Podstawa prawna
Rozporządzenie art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b) lub art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f)
Długość okresu przetwarzania danych
Przez okres do czasu zakończenia umowy, po tym czasie – w innych zgodnych z prawem celach, a w przypadkach w których znajdzie to zastosowanie – nie dłużej niż do końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym upływa właściwy termin przedawnienia roszczenia.
Przez okres prowadzonej komunikacji lub dostarczania usług, nie później niż do złożenia skutecznego sprzeciwu.
Do czasu udzielenia odpowiedzi na zgłoszenie reklamacyjne.
W przypadku, gdy w ww. okresie będzie toczył się spór lub będzie trwało postępowanie, w szczególności sądowe, dane osobowe będą przetwarzane przez okres ustalony zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami Kodeksu cywilnego regulującymi okresy przedawnienia, który będzie liczony od dnia zakończenia sporu lub prawomocnego zakończenia postępowania.
Wypełnienie obowiązków wynikających z przepisów prawa
Wyjaśnienie
W zależności od relacji łączącej Cię z Goodie, Goodie może przetwarzać Twoje dane osobowe po to, aby spełnić obowiązki nałożone na nie z mocy przepisów prawa. W szczególności mówimy tu o wypełnianiu obowiązków związanych z realizacją zawartych umów oraz w celach archiwizacyjnych. Obowiązki takie wynikają z ustawy o rachunkowości, prawa podatkowego czy prawa o ochronie konkurencji i konsumentów.
Podstawa prawna
Rozporządzenie art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c)
Długość okresu przetwarzania danych
Do czasu wypełnienia przez Goodie obowiązków określonych w poszczególnych przepisach prawa, w tym:
W zakresie przetwarzania danych osobowych dla celów dokumentacji podatkowej – przez okres 5 lat licząc od końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym upłynął termin płatności podatku.
W zakresie przetwarzania danych osobowych dla celów dokumentacji księgowej – przez okres 5 lat licząc od końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym operacje, transakcje lub postępowanie zostały/zostaną ostatecznie zakończone, spłacone, rozliczone lub przedawnione.
Pozostałe cele realizowane w ramach tzw. uzasadnionego interesu administratora danych
Wyjaśnienie
Celami realizowanymi w ramach tzw. prawnie uzasadnionego interesu są:
wykonanie umowy, której nie jesteś stroną, lub podjęcie działań na żądanie innej osoby przed zawarciem umowy (np. gdy zostałeś ustanowiony pełnomocnikiem lub jesteś reprezentantem),
zapewnianie bezpieczeństwa świadczonych usług, w szczególności zapobieganie nadużyciom,
dostosowanie treści marketingowych stron Goodie, w zależności od zachowań osób je wyświetlających,
organizacja i przeprowadzanie konkursów zgodnie z postanowieniami regulaminów,
w przypadku jeśli znajdzie to zastosowanie, w celach powiązanych z prowadzeniem postępowań spornych, a także postępowań przed organami władzy publicznej oraz innych postepowań, w tym w celu dochodzenia oraz obrony przed roszczeniami,
wewnętrzne cele administracyjne, analityczne i statystyczne, w tym statystyki i raportowania wewnętrznego Goodie oraz w ramach Grupy Kapitałowej Banku Millennium S.A.
Oceniając czy wskazane cele są uzasadnione Goodie bierze pod uwagę, czy Twoje interesy, prawa lub wolności nie mają nadrzędnego charakteru nad prawnie uzasadnionymi interesami Goodie.
Podstawa prawna
Rozporządzenie, art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f)
Długość okresu przetwarzania danych:
Do czasu wypełnienia prawnie uzasadnionych interesów Goodie stanowiących podstawę tego przetwarzania lub wniesienia skutecznego sprzeciwu wobec takiego przetwarzania, nie dłużej niż do końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym upływa właściwy termin przedawnienia roszczenia. W przypadku, gdy w ww. okresie będzie toczył się spór lub będzie trwało postępowanie, w szczególności sądowe, dane osobowe będą przetwarzane przez okres ustalony zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami Kodeksu cywilnego regulującymi okresy przedawnienia, który będzie liczony od dnia zakończenia sporu lub prawomocnego zakończenia postępowania.
Skąd pozyskujemy Twoje dane osobowe?
Goodie przetwarza Twoje dane osobowe pozyskane bezpośrednio od Ciebie (np. dane podane na formularzach), a także pozyskane z innych źródeł. Tymi innymi źródłami mogą być m.in. partnerzy organizujący programy lojalnościowe, partnerzy promocji specjalnych Goodie, źródła o ograniczonym dostępie, np. serwisy społecznościowe, Google+, Facebook (w przypadku rejestrowania się lub logowania się do konta na Platformie za pośrednictwem portali społecznościowych). W każdym ze wskazanych przypadków Goodie skrupulatnie weryfikuje czy ma podstawę prawną przetwarzania danych osobowych.
Jakie kategorie Twoich danych osobowych przetwarzamy?
Goodie może przetwarzać następujące kategorie danych osobowych pozyskanych od Ciebie lub osób trzecich:
dane identyfikacyjne (np. imię i nazwisko, pseudonim),
dane kontaktowe (np. numer telefonu, adres poczty elektronicznej),
dane socjo-demograficzne (np. płeć, data urodzenia),
dane behawioralne (np. dane posiadanych kart lojalnościowych oraz sposobu ich wykorzystania),
dane komunikacyjne (np. dane prowadzonej z Tobą komunikacji),
dane techniczne (np. dane urządzenia, na którym korzystasz z Platformy Goodie),
dane lokalizacyjne (np. dane lokalizacji miejsca użycia karty lojalnościowej za pomocą Platformy Goodie),
dane historii przeglądania (np. dane niezbędne do utrzymania właściwej wymiany informacji pomiędzy serwerem i przeglądarką podczas korzystania z Platformy Goodie).
Komu Twoje dane mogą być ujawniane?
Dostęp do Twoich danych osobowych – wewnątrz struktury organizacyjnej Goodie – będą mieć wyłącznie upoważnieni przez Goodie pracownicy i tylko w niezbędnym zakresie. W pewnych sytuacjach Twoje dane osobowe mogą być ujawniane przez Goodie odbiorcom poza strukturą Goodie. Zawsze w takiej sytuacji Goodie dokładnie bada podstawę prawną ujawnienia danych osobowych. Należy zwrócić uwagę, że odbiorcą danych w rozumieniu Rozporządzenia jest zarówno podmiot, który przetwarza dane osobowe w imieniu Goodie, jak i podmiot, któremu dane są udostępniane dla jego własnych celów (np. nasi Partnerzy, z którymi organizujemy programy lojalnościowe i specjalne promocje, organy administracji publicznej).
Odbiorcami Twoich danych osobowych mogą być:
organy publiczne, instytucje lub podmioty trzecie uprawnione do żądania dostępu lub otrzymania danych osobowych na podstawie przepisów prawa, np. Urząd Skarbowy,
podmioty, którym Goodie powierzyło przetwarzanie danych osobowych na podstawie zawartych umów, np. dostawcy przesyłek kurierskich, dostawcy IT i innych usług przetwarzający dane w imieniu Goodie,
podmioty świadczące usługi telekomunikacyjne,
podmioty świadczące usługi doradczo–kontrolne np. firmy audytorskie,
podmioty przetwarzające dane w celu prowadzenia zastępstwa procesowego np. kancelarie prawne,
podmioty, wobec których wyraziłeś zgodę na udostępnienie i przetwarzanie swoich danych osobowych,
podmioty, z którymi Goodie współpracuje w zakresie programów lojalnościowych, np. Partnerzy i najemcy,
podmioty działające w ramach Grupy Kapitałowej Banku Millennium S.A. lub podmioty z grupy kapitałowej odpowiedzialne za realizację obowiązków kontraktowych oraz wynikających z przepisów prawa.
Zawsze, gdy Goodie udostępnia Twoje dane osobowe osobom trzecim w krajach spoza Europejskiego Obszaru Gospodarczego (EOG), stosowane są niezbędne zabezpieczenia w celu zapewnienia ich odpowiedniej ochrony. W tym celu polegamy między innymi na:
wymaganiach opartych na obowiązujących przepisach ustawowych i wykonawczych;
standardowych klauzulach umownych UE (jeśli znajdują zastosowanie), dzięki czemu mamy pewność, że przekazywanie danych osobowych poza Europejski Obszar Gospodarczy jest zgodne z Rozporządzeniem.
Szczegółowa lista odbiorców jest dostępna
tutaj
Jakie są Twoje prawa?
Przysługuje Ci szereg praw dotyczących danych osobowych, w tym: prawo dostępu do nich, możliwość zmian, ograniczenie przetwarzania.
Goodie zobowiązane jest do udzielenia informacji, o które wnioskujesz w terminie miesiąca od otrzymania wniosku. Jeśli żądanie ma skomplikowany charakter lub liczba żądań jest duża, Goodie ma prawo przedłużyć termin rozpatrzenia wniosku o dodatkowe dwa miesiące, o czym Goodie Cię uprzednio poinformuje w terminie miesiąca od otrzymania wniosku. Maksymalny termin realizacji nie może być dłuższy niż 3 miesiące od daty otrzymania wniosku.
Podjęcie przez Goodie działań zawartych w złożonym wniosku oraz wydanie kopii danych jest bezpłatne. Jeżeli jednak żądanie jest ewidentnie nieuzasadnione lub nadmierne, w szczególności ze względu na swój ustawiczny charakter, Goodie może odmówić podjęcia działań podając uzasadnienie.
W przypadkach uznania, iż przetwarzanie przez Goodie Twoich danych osobowych narusza przepisy Rozporządzenia, przysługuje Ci prawo do wniesienia skargi do organu nadzorczego, tj. Prezesa Urzędu Ochrony Danych Osobowych.
Jeśli chcesz złożyć Wniosek o realizację powyższych praw możesz to zrobić:
poprzez formularz kontaktowy dostępny na Platformie,
poprzez e-mail wysłany na adres kontakt@goodie.pl,
wysyłając pismo na adres: Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o., ul. Stanisława Żaryna 2A, 02-593 Warszawa.
Szczegółowa Informacja o Twoich prawach:
przysługuje Ci prawo dostępu do Twoich danych osobowych, w tym uzyskania kopii danych;
jeśli uznasz, że Twoje dane osobowe przetwarzane przez Goodie są niezgodne z rzeczywistością, masz prawo ich sprostowania lub uzupełnienia,
masz prawo żądania usunięcia Twoich danych osobowych w przypadkach przewidzianych prawem,
masz prawo wniesienia żądania ograniczenia przetwarzania Twoich danych osobowych,
masz prawo wniesienia sprzeciwu wobec przetwarzania Twoich danych osobowych w przypadku przetwarzania ich w celu realizacji uzasadnionego interesu Goodie,
masz również prawo do otrzymania od Goodie Twoich danych osobowych w ustrukturyzowanym formacie oraz przenoszenia danych osobowych do innego administratora. W przypadku przeniesienia danych, z uwagi na inne przepisy prawa, może być wymagane uzyskanie zgody Twojej lub innej osoby lub spełnienie innych warunków wymaganych tymi przepisami,
masz prawo, aby nie podlegać decyzji opierającej się wyłącznie na zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu, w tym profilowaniu, które wywołuje wobec Ciebie skutki prawne lub w inny sposób istotnie na Ciebie wpływa, chyba, że decyzja ta jest niezbędna do realizacji umowy, jest dozwolona prawem lub wyraziłeś wcześniej na to wyraźną zgodę,
w przypadkach, w których przetwarzanie danych odbywa się na podstawie udzielonej zgody, przysługuje Ci prawo do cofnięcia udzielonych zgód na poszczególne cele przetwarzania, w dowolnym momencie. Zgodę możesz wycofać za pośrednictwem formularza kontaktowego dostępnego na stronie goodie.pl i aplikacji mobilnej goodie. Wycofanie zgody nie wpływa na zgodność z prawem przetwarzania, realizowanego do czasu wycofania zgody.
W przypadku założenia konta Użytkownika lub przystąpienia do programu lojalnościowego podanie danych osobowych jest konieczne do realizacji usług.
Czy Goodie podejmuje decyzje w sposób zautomatyzowany?
Goodie nie przetwarza Twoich danych osobowych w sposób zautomatyzowany, mogący skutkować zautomatyzowanym podejmowaniem decyzji, w tym decyzji opartych na profilowaniu. Jeśli będziesz podlegać decyzji opartej na zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu, zostaniesz o tym odrębnie poinformowany – wraz z informacją o zasadach podejmowania takiej decyzji oraz o jej znaczeniu i przewidywanych konsekwencjach.
Pliki do pobrania
Informacje dotyczące przetwarzania danych osobowych Użytkowników Platformy w Millennium Goodie Sp. z .o.o.
Informacje dotyczące przetwarzania danych osobowych Kontrahentów będących osobami fizycznymi oraz Reprezentantów, w tym Członków Organów / Pracowników / Zleceniobiorców Kontrahenta Millennium Goodie sp. z o.o.
Informacje dotyczące przetwarzania danych osobowych kandydatów do pracy w Millennium Goodie Sp. z .o.o.
Informacje dotyczące przetwarzania danych osobowych pracowników w Millennium Goodie Sp. z .o.o.
Informacje dotyczące przetwarzania danych osobowych osób zatrudnionych na umowę zlecenie, umowę o dzieło, praktykantów w Millennium Goodie Sp. z .o.o.
Zasady ochrony prywatności
Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o. zapewnia swoim Użytkownikom bezpieczeństwo dokonywania operacji. Wszelkie informacje przekazywane przez naszych Użytkowników chronione są przy użyciu nowoczesnych technologii, zgodnie z obowiązującymi normami prawnymi, wymaganiami bezpieczeństwa i zasadami poufności.
Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o. aktywnie rozwija swoje systemy ochrony prywatności oraz bezpieczeństwa Użytkowników wdrażając nowe zabezpieczenia organizacyjne oraz techniczne. O zmianach w stosowanych zasadach ochrony poufności Millennium Goodie Sp. z o.o. informuje Użytkowników przy pomocy strony internetowej lub innej, uzgodnionej z Klientem drogi komunikacji.
Pliki cookie i podobne technologie
Strona internetowa Goodie wykorzystuje pliki cookie (ciasteczka) zapisywane w pamięci urządzenia końcowego (np. komputer, tablet, telefon), z którego użytkownik korzysta podczas przeglądania strony internetowej. W większości przypadków jest to niezbędne do prawidłowego działania strony. Ciasteczka umożliwiają spersonalizowanie serwisów internetowych, które pozwalają użytkownikom decydować np. o kolejności wyświetlania niektórych elementów lub o dopasowaniu reklam. Pliki cookie są również używane przez narzędzia analizujące ruch na stronach internetowych. Analizy statystyczne przeprowadzane z wykorzystaniem tych narzędzi są jednym ze źródeł poprawy jakości strony internetowej Goodie.
Jeśli wyrazisz zgodę na cookies marketingowe, Goodie będzie mogła łączyć informacje zebrane na ich podstawie z innymi posiadanymi przez Goodie danymi swoich użytkowników, w celu przygotowania oferty produktów lub usług jak najlepiej dopasowanych do Ciebie.
Jakie pliki cookie / identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych zbiera Goodie?
W zależności od celu, w jakim Goodie zbiera pliki cookie, wyróżnia się cookies: niezbędne i marketingowe.
I. Niezbędne pliki cookie i identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych
Niezbędne pliki cookie
– są niezbędne do prawidłowego działania strony internetowej lub dostarczania usług świadczonych przez Goodie drogą elektroniczną, żądanych przez użytkownika. Ich instalacja jest możliwa, jeśli użytkownik za pomocą ustawień oprogramowania na swoim urządzeniu wyraził na nie zgodę.
Goodie wykorzystuje je do:
Zapewnienia bezpieczeństwa, w tym wykrywania nadużyć;
Zapewnienia odpowiedniego wyświetlania strony (w zależności od wykorzystywanego urządzenia);
Podtrzymywania stanu zalogowania użytkownika;
Zapamiętania wybranych przez użytkownika ustawień i personalizację interfejsu użytkownika w zakresie np. wybranego języka lub regionu, z którego pochodzi użytkownik, rozmiaru czcionki, wyglądu strony internetowej (cookies preferencyjne).
W ramach
niezbędnych
plików
cookie
Goodie wyróżnia
analityczne pliki
cookie
, które służą do monitorowania poprawności funkcjonowania serwisów internetowych Goodie i ich bezpieczeństwa, w tym:
zbierania informacji o sposobie korzystania ze strony internetowej Goodie, tj.badania statystyk dotyczących ruchu;
wykrywania różnego rodzaju nadużyć, np. sztucznego ruchu internetowego, generowanego przez boty;
ulepszania strony internetowej Goodie.
Goodie, w celu świadczenia usług, korzysta ponadto z następujących rozwiązań, wykorzystujących identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych:
Huawei Analytics Kit
– Usługa zapisująca techniczne parametry działania aplikacji, zapisuje i przekazuje Goodie informację o błędach, które wystąpiły w aplikacji Goodie zainstalowanej na telefonie użytkownika. Bez tej usługi zapewnienie jakości usług oferowanych przez Goodie w aplikacji jest znacznie ograniczone.
Firebase – Crashlytics
– usługa zapisująca techniczne parametry działania aplikacji, np. zapisuje i przekazuje Goodie informację o błędach, które wystąpiły w aplikacji Goodie zainstalowanej na telefonie użytkownika. Bez tej usługi zapewnienie jakości usług oferowanych przez Goodie w aplikacji jest znacznie ograniczone.
Firebase – Realtime Database
– baza danych w chmurze przechowująca listy zakupowe użytkowników, niezbędna do działania aplikacji mobilnej Goodie.
II. Marketingowe pliki cookie i reklamowe identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych
Marketingowe pliki
cookie
– służą do profilowania reklam wyświetlanych w zewnętrznych serwisach internetowych i w serwisach internetowych Goodie, bazując na preferencjach użytkowników w zakresie wyboru usług, z wykorzystaniem danych posiadanych przez Goodie, w tym zachowania użytkowników na stronach internetowych Goodie. Te
cookies
instalowane na urządzeniu użytkownika tylko w przypadku, gdy wyraził on na to zgodę.
W aplikacjach mobilnych nie ma plików cookie.
Zamiast nich używa się identyfikatorów urządzeń mobilnych, które są dostarczane przez system operacyjny urządzenia mobilnego i mogą zostać zresetowane przez użytkownika. Identyfikator urządzenia (ang. Device ID) to seria cyfr i liter, która pozwala na identyfikację każdego urządzenia mobilnego (tabletu, smartfonu) i jest przechowywana w takim urządzeniu. Dostęp do identyfikatora może być uzyskany przez każdą pobieraną i instalowaną aplikację. Aplikacje najczęściej wykorzystują identyfikator do komunikacji z serwerem. Identyfikatory mogą, tak jak marketingowe pliki cookie, służyć do profilowania reklam bazując na preferencjach (zachowaniach) użytkowników. Typowe identyfikatory wyświetlania reklam to AdID (Android) oraz IDFA (Apple). Na urządzeniach mobilnych pozwalają one deweloperom i specjalistom ds. marketingu śledzić aktywność w celach reklamowych. Zwiększają też możliwości wyświetlania i kierowania reklam.
W ramach
marketingowych
plików cookie Goodie wyróżnia
analityczne pliki cookie
, które wykorzystują dane statystyczne, służące do:
pomiaru efektywności akcji prowadzonych na rzecz Goodie na zewnętrznych stronach internetowych oraz ograniczania niektórych działań a także ulepszania strony internetowej;
badania skuteczności działań promocyjnych;
dokonywania rozliczeń z partnerami biznesowymi .
Goodie wykorzystuje marketingowe pliki cookie i reklamowe identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych do:
profilowania reklam wyświetlanych w serwisie Goodie:
Google AdManager
– Goodie korzysta z narzędzia Google AdManager do zarządzania kampaniami marketingowymi z wykorzystaniem plików cookie oraz reklamowych identyfikatorów urządzeń mobilnych, w celu wyświetlania spersonalizowanych reklam lub zliczania użytkowników odwiedzających konkretną stronę. Google AdManager służy do remarketingu, ograniczania liczby wyświetleń i śledzenia konwersji w zasobach reklamowych Ad Manager. Ponadto pozwala skuteczniej mierzyć wyniki kampanii dzięki ulepszonym mechanizmom śledzenia i atrybucji.
Yieldbird (YB)
– YB może wykorzystywać pliki cookie w celach marketingowych, w tym do wysyłania Użytkownikom reklam opartych na aktywności użytkowników. W tym celu YB może przechowywać informacje i uzyskiwać dostęp do informacji już przechowywanych w telekomunikacyjnym urządzeniu końcowym Użytkownika (komputer, telefon, tablet itp.). YB może również używać tagów retargetujących i remarketingowych, które rozpoznają i przekazują informacje innym plikom cookie. Te tagi personalizują doświadczenie użytkownika i reklamy wyświetlane użytkownikowi w oparciu o jego aktywność w innych witrynach internetowych korzystających z tych samych tagów. Więcej informacji zawiera polityka prywatności Yieldbird dostępna
tutaj
Gemius
– na stronach Goodie używane są pliki cookie firmy Gemius. Ciasteczka te używane są w celu prowadzenia badania oglądalności stron internetowych w Polsce oraz w celu badań statystycznych o ruchu na tej stronie internetowej. Gemius, prowadząc badanie, może zaprosić użytkownika danej strony do udziału w badaniu. Zaproszenie następuje poprzez wyświetlenie kwestionariusza zbierającego dane społeczno-demograficzne, wyłącznie za zgodą użytkownika. Pełne dane Gemius przechowuje przez okres 3 lat, począwszy od momentu rozpoczęcia zbierania tych danych. Dane starsze niż 3 lata są próbkowane (bardzo duża część jest usuwana, a zachowywane są jedynie dane reprezentatywne) i przechowywane przez Gemius w celach statystycznych, z zachowaniem odpowiednich środków ochrony. Gemius wspiera ochronę danych osobowych zgodnie z polityką prywatności dostępną na swojej stronie lub
tutaj
profilowania reklam Goodie wyświetlanych w zewnętrznych serwisach internetowych:
AppsFlyer
– Goodie korzysta z usług AppsFlyer do oceny i analizy skuteczności działań marketingowych Goodie oraz działania kanałów w Internecie, w celu uzyskania informacji, jak poszczególni użytkownicy reagują na konkretne kampanie, jak trafiają do aplikacji Goodie, korzystają z niej i wchodzą z nią w interakcje. Oznacza to, że niektóre informacje, jak unikalne identyfikatory oraz dane techniczne (np. IP urządzenia, user agent, model urządzenia z którego korzysta użytkownik, wersja systemu operacyjnego urządzenia, strony www, które odwiedza) są zbierane, przetwarzane i wykorzystywane zgodnie z polityką prywatności dostępną
tutaj
Google Analytics
(analytics.google.com) – Goodie korzysta z Google Analytics, usługi tworzenia
statystyki stron internetowych świadczonej przez Google. Informacja wytworzona przez plik cookie, dotycząca
korzystania z danego serwisu jest przekazywana i przechowywana przez Google. Google może również przesyłać
informacje podmiotom zewnętrznym, jeżeli wymagają tego przepisy prawa lub w przypadku, gdy podmioty zewnętrzne
przetwarzają je w imieniu Google. Informacje, które są zbierane i przetwarzane w systemie to m.in. lokalizacja
(dokładność do miejscowości bez udostępnienia pełnego adresu IP), przeglądarka, system operacyjny, parametry
utm kampanii, adresy URL, interakcje z serwisem jak kliknięcie w element, losowo generowany identyfikator
urządzenia/przeglądarki. Więcej informacji o Google Analytics, w tym miejscu przechowywania informacji
wytworzonych przez pliki cookie, znajduje się na stronie poświęconej zagadnieniom cookie, bezpieczeństwa
danych i polityce prywatności Google, dostępnej
tutaj
.
Użytkownik może wyłączyć korzystanie z jego danych w Google Analytics instalując dodatek Google do
przeglądarki – więcej informacji
tutaj
Jeśli Google Analytics jest aktywne, Goodie korzysta z
Firebase – SDK for Google Analytics
– rozwiązania w zakresie analityki aplikacji mobilnej. Firebase zasila danymi usługę Google Analytics dotyczącą zachowania użytkownika na platformie i parametrów urządzenia, dodatkowo zbiera informacje techniczne o używaniu aplikacji. Pozyskane dane Goodie wykorzystuje do ulepszania działań, a także do optymalizacji kampanii marketingowych.
Google Ads
– Platforma reklamowa Google pozwalająca na wyświetlanie linków sponsorowanych w wynikach
wyszukiwania wyszukiwarki Google oraz reklam na stronach współpracujących z Google, np. remarketingowych. Do
mierzenia skuteczności działań Goodie oraz ich optymalizacji, Goodie korzysta ze śledzenia konwersji. Dzięki
temu wiemy np. czy po kliknięciu w reklamę doszło do zrealizowania ważnego dla nas celu w serwisie Goodie.
Informacja ta pozwala monitorować i optymalizować na bieżąco nasze działania marketingowe. Google Analytics z
włączoną funkcją reklamową pozwala także na skonfigurowanie listy odbiorców reklam. Polityka prywatności
dostępna jest
tutaj
. Użytkownik w każdej chwili może
zrezygnować z cookies Google w
ustawieniach
reklam
Pixel Facebook
– w celu śledzenia aktywności użytkowników portalu Facebook na potrzeby analizy rynku
oraz rozwoju oferty, Goodie używa pixela i SDK Facebooka. Przekazują one do Facebooka dane o zachowaniu
użytkownika na platformie Goodie – przekazywane są informacje o przeglądanych stronach oraz wybranych
wykonanych akcjach. Te cookies wykorzystywane są w celu prezentowania reklam i rekomendowania ofert osobom,
które mogą być nimi zainteresowane. Użytkownik w każdej chwili może dopasować wyświetlane reklamy do swoich
preferencji
tutaj
Benhauer „Salesmanago”
– Goodie współpracuje z Benhauer sp. z o.o., dostawcą SalesManago – systemu „marketing automation”, który automatyzuje analizę ruchu klientów na stronie internetowej, dostarczanie treści marketingowych, personalizację przedstawianych ofert czy obsługę e-mail marketingu (poprzez wysyłkę newsletterów) lub webpushy. O szczegółowym zakresie i zasadach działania SalesManago możesz się dowiedzieć
tutaj
Ponadto, w celu ulepszania usług Goodie korzysta z
HotJar
– narzędzia pokazującego tzw. heatmaps, czyli odpowiednik „mapy” na stronie internetowej wskazujący, gdzie (w jakie miejsca) użytkownicy klikają oraz umożliwiający analitykę zorientowaną na zachowanie użytkownika na stronie Web.
Jak długo Goodie będzie przechowywać pliki cookie / identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych w moim urządzeniu?
W zależności od czasu, na jaki Goodie zbiera pliki cookie, wyróżnia się cookies sesyjne i stałe.
Sesyjne (czasowe) pliki
cookie
– są przechowywane w urządzeniu użytkownika do chwili
wyłączenia oprogramowania lub zakończenia sesji przeglądarki (do momentu jej zamknięcia). Są nimi przede
wszystkim niezbędne pliki cookie.
Stałe (trwałe) pliki
cookie
– są przechowywane w urządzeniu użytkownika po wyłączeniu
oprogramowania lub zakończeniu sesji (zamknięciu) przez czas określony w parametrach albo do momentu ich
usunięcia przez użytkownika za pomocą ustawień oprogramowania.
Goodie nie przechowuje marketingowych plików cookie ani reklamowych identyfikatorów urządzeń mobilnych (Ad-ID Android oraz IDFA iOS) dłużej niż przez okres 3 lat.
Kto korzysta z plików cookie instalowanych w moim urządzeniu?
W zależności od podmiotu, który korzysta z plików cookie, wyróżnia się:
Własne pliki cookie
(tzw. first party cookies) – są to cookies, które umieszcza i do których dostęp uzyskuje wyłącznie Goodie.
Pliki cookie podmiotów trzecich
(third-party cookies) – są to cookies, które umieszczają i do których
dostęp mają podmioty trzecie. Goodie dopuszcza wyłącznie cookies tych podmiotów trzecich, które umożliwiają
dopasowanie reklam do preferencji użytkownika. Takie cookies należą do cookies marketingowych, tzn. że Goodie
może z nich korzystać jeśli wyrazisz na nie zgodę.
Informacje przekazywane w plikach cookies innym niż Goodie podmiotom są szyfrowane w taki sposób, aby nie przekazywać danych użytkowników serwisów.
Szczegółowe informacje o identyfikatorach urządzeń mobilnych
Poniżej znajdziesz informacje o wykorzystywanych identyfikatorach użytkowników aplikacji Goodie, które zapisujemy w bazie danych Goodie:
UserAgent – jest to charakterystyczny ciąg tekstowy, który umożliwia serwerom i sieciom równorzędnym identyfikację aplikacji, systemu operacyjnego, dostawcy i/lub wersji żądającego agenta użytkownika
Goodie internal user ID – identyfikuje użytkownika Goodie i może być wykorzystany do dostarczania spersonalizowanej treści
DeviceId – jest to unikalny identyfikator urządzenia, który może być wykorzystany do dostosowania naszej usługi do Twojego urządzenia lub analizy problemów z urządzeniem związanych z naszymi usługami
Poniżej znajdziesz informacje o identyfikatorach użytkowników aplikacji Goodie, które wykorzystywane są przez firmy zewnętrzne:
IDFA (iOS)/AdId (Android) – numer identyfikacyjny specyficzny dla danego urządzenia, którego reklamodawcy używają do śledzenia aktywności konkretnego użytkownika i na tej podstawie dostarczają mu spersonalizowanych
reklam
IDFV (iOS) – identyfikator, który jest unikalny dla urządzenia z systemem iOS i pozostaje w każdej aplikacji wydanej w App Store z tego samego konta programisty.
Android ID – 64-bitowa liczba (wyrażona jako ciąg szesnastkowy), unikalna dla każdej kombinacji klucza podpisywania aplikacji, użytkownika i urządzenia
Firebase installation IDs – wykorzystywany jest do obliczania liczby unikalnych instalacji Firebase mających dostęp do zasobów sieciowych, aby zapewnić wystarczającą anonimowość wzorców dostępu.
Analytics App Instance IDs – służy do identyfikacji instancji aplikacji.
Adresy IP– Każdemu urządzeniu podłączonemu do Internetu przypisywany jest numer zwany adresem protokołu
internetowego (IP). Numery te są zwykle przydzielane w blokach geograficznych. Adres IP może służyć do
identyfikowania lokalizacji, z której urządzenie łączy się z Internetem. Adres IP służy również do
identyfikowania lokalizacji, z której urządzenie łączy się z Internetem; wykorzystywane jest przez narzędzia
do profilowania, aby lepiej zrozumieć trendy użycia aplikacji I awarie platformy oraz mapowania wydarzeń
związanych z wydajnością na kraje, z których pochodzą, otwierania nowo zainstalowanych aplikacji (iOS) na
określonej stronie lub w kontekście
User agents – jest to charakterystyczny ciąg tekstowy, który umożliwia serwerom i sieciom równorzędnym identyfikację aplikacji, systemu operacyjnego, dostawcy i/lub wersji żądającego agenta użytkownika.
Device specs (iOS) – jest wykorzystywany do otwierania nowo zainstalowanych aplikacji (iOS) na określonej stronie lub w kontekście
Crashlytics Installation UUIDs – Wykorzystywane do pomiaru liczby użytkowników dotkniętych awarią i danych pliku minidump do przetwarzania awarii NDK.
Crash traces – wykorzystywane są do diagnozowania awarii aplikacji
Goodie internal user ID – zaszyfrowana wartość wysyłana do Google Ad Managera, wykorzystywane jest do optymalizacji kampanii reklamowych oraz analiz dot. użycia aplikacji
Czy konieczne jest akceptowanie cookies / identyfikatorów urządzeń mobilnych?
Akceptowanie
cookies
jest dobrowolne. Możesz (1) wyłączyć instalowanie lub usunąć
cookies
za pomocą ustawień własnej przeglądarki w urządzeniu lub (2) nie wyrazić zgody na instalowanie
cookies
w celach marketingowych.
W pierwszym przypadku może mieć to wpływ na niektóre funkcjonalności na stronach Goodie.
Korzystając z serwisów internetowych lub aplikacji Goodie można nie wyrazić zgody na wykorzystanie plików
cookies
w celach marketingowych. Spowoduje to jednak, że reklamy nie będą dopasowywane do preferencji
użytkownika. Oznacza to, że jeśli jesteś byłeś zainteresowany ofertą, nie będziesz widział informacji na temat
usług ani ofert promocyjnych Goodie, którymi byłbyś zainteresowany, a reklamy wyświetlane w Twoim urządzeniu
będą miały charakter ogólny, kontekstowy (tzn. będą wyświetlane w oparciu o populację – na podobnej zasadzie jak
działają reklamy w czasopismach) – zarówno na stronach Goodie jak i na innych stronach internetowych, które
odwiedzisz.
Wyłączenie plików cookie
Obecnie większość przeglądarek internetowych dostępnych na rynku domyślnie akceptuje zapisywanie plików
cookie. Każdy ma możliwość określenia warunków korzystania z tych plików za pomocą ustawień własnej przeglądarki
internetowej. Oznacza to, że można np. częściowo ograniczyć (np. czasowo) lub całkowicie wyłączyć możliwość
zapisywania plików cookie – w tym ostatnim wypadku jednak może to mieć wpływ na niektóre funkcjonalności.
Można również w każdej chwili usunąć pliki cookie zapisane w przeglądarce. Szczegółowe informacje na temat zmiany ustawień dotyczących plików cookie oraz ich samodzielnego usuwania w najpopularniejszych przeglądarkach internetowych dostępne są w dziale pomocy przeglądarki internetowej oraz na poniższych stronach:
Chrome
Firefox
Internet Explorer
Opera
Safari
Microsoft Edge
Wyłączenie identyfikatorów urządzeń mobilnych
Można również w każdej chwili usunąć reklamowe identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych zapisane w urządzeniu mobilnym. Szczegółowe informacje na temat zmiany ustawień dotyczących identyfikatorów oraz ich samodzielnego blokowania dostępne są w dziale pomocy dostawcy oprogramowania Twojego urządzenia.
Ograniczenie identyfikatorów reklam dotyczy aplikacji, nie obejmuje więc witryn odwiedzanych przez przeglądarkę. Zresetowanie identyfikatora spowoduje, że reklamy, które wyświetlają się w Twoim urządzeniu, nie będą spersonalizowane.
Cookies i identyfikatory urządzeń mobilnych a dane osobowe
Identyfikatory internetowe takie jak adresy IP, identyfikatory mobilne, identyfikatory plików cookie – mogą
stanowić dane osobowe. Jednocześnie informacje dostępne w plikach cookie dla innych niż Goodie podmiotów są
szyfrowane w taki sposób, aby nie przekazywać danych użytkowników serwisu. Informacje o przetwarzaniu danych
osobowych przez Goodie, w tym o celach długości o podstawach przetwarzania, a także przekazywaniu informacji
osobom trzecim w krajach spoza Europejskiego Obszaru Gospodarczego (EOG) znajdziesz w pozostałych sekcjach
polityki prywatności Goodie.
Zaufani Partnerzy
W świetle obowiązującego prawa, administratorami Twoich danych w ramach poszczególnych usług mogą być również Zaufani Partnerzy.
Zaufani Partnerzy to podmioty tradycyjnie występujące na rynku reklamy oraz te charakterystyczne dla nowoczesnych form automatycznej sprzedaży i zakupu reklamy internetowej z którymi współpracuje Goodie, w tym podmioty polecane przez międzynarodowe organizacje branżowe, takie jak np. organizacja IAB (Interactive Advertising Bureau). Listę Zaufanych Partnerów IAB znajdziesz
tutaj
Zaufani Partnerzy to:
reklamodawcy, którzy bezpośrednio lub pośrednio zlecają Goodie działania marketingowe oraz remarketingowe,
domy mediowe i sieci reklamowe występujące w imieniu naszych reklamodawców,
brokerzy i inni pośrednicy działający na rynku reklamy internetowej,
agencje interaktywne specjalizujące się w marketingu internetowym,
sieci reklamowe działające na rynku reklamy internetowej w technologii programmatic, czyli modelu polegającego na automatyzacji sprzedaży i zakupu reklamy internetowej, w której wyodrębnić można:
operatorów platform do zbierania i zarządzania danymi o Tobie, które mogą być wykorzystywane zarówno przez Goodie, Klientów jak i reklamodawców współpracujących z tymi platformami,
operatorów platform strony popytowej, których reklamodawca lub dom mediowy, sieć reklamowa lub agencja używa do kupowania powierzchni reklamowej,
operatorów platform strony podażowej, umożliwiających Goodie udostępnienie powierzchni reklamowej do sprzedaży reklamodawcom, domom mediowym, sieciom reklamowym czy też agencjom reklamowym.
Sieci reklamowe to w szczególności podmioty oferujące usługi automatyzacji sprzedaży i zakupu reklamy internetowej, takie jak platformy udostępniające powierzchnię reklamową reklamodawcom, platformy zbierania i zarządzania danymi o użytkownikach na potrzeby reklamodawców, a także do kupowania powierzchni reklamowej przez reklamodawców z którymi współpracuje Goodie,
podmioty świadczące usługi analityczne.
SZCZEGÓŁOWA LISTA ODBIORCÓW DANYCH OSOBOWYCH W PODZIALE NA KATEGORIE
Organy publiczne, instytucje lub podmioty trzecie uprawnione do żądania dostępu lub
otrzymania danych osobowych na podstawie przepisów prawa
Urząd Skarbowy, adres właściwy dla podmiotu danych
https://urzadskarbowy.gov.pl/
Urząd Ochrony Danych Osobowych, ul. Stawki 2, 00-193 Warszawa
https://uodo.gov.pl/pl/1/255
Podmioty, którym Goodie powierzyło przetwarzanie danych osobowych na podstawie zawartych umów
Bank Millennium S.A., ul. Stanisława Żaryna 2A, 02-593 Warszawa
https://www.bankmillennium.pl/ochrona-danych
Google AdManager – Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Google Analytics 360 – Google Ireland Limited, Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Facebook Ireland Ltd., 4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbour, D2 Dublin, Ireland
https://pl-pl.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
Benhauer Sp. z o.o., ul. Grzegórzecka 21, 31-532 Kraków
https://www.salesmanago.pl/info/obowiazek-informacyjny.htm
AppsFlyer Ltd., 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/
Gemius S.A., ul. Domaniewska 48, 02-672 Warszawa
http://www.gemius.pl/polityka-prywatnosci.html
YIELDBIRD Sp. z o.o., with its seat in Warsaw, at ul. Czerska 8/10
https://yieldbird.com/privacy-policy/
Huawei Polska Sp. z o.o. z siedzibą pod adresem Horizon Plaza, Domaniewska 39A, 02-672 Warszawa, Poland
https://consumer.huawei.com/pl/privacy/privacy-policy/
Hotjar Ltd Dragonara Business Centre 5th Floor, Dragonara Road, Paceville St Julian’s STJ 3141, Malta
https://www.hotjar.com/legal/policies/privacy/
Już nigdy
nie zapomnisz o cashbacku!
Zainstaluj
bezpłatną i bezpieczną
wtyczkę, która podczas zakupów automatycznie poinformuje Cię o dostępności cashbacku!
Dowiedz się więcej
Strona internetowa Goodie wykorzystuje pliki cookie zapisywane w pamięci przeglądarki internetowej. Szczegółowe informacje dostępne są
tutaj
.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
https://pl-pl.facebook.com/privacy/explanation:
Facebook
Adres e-mail lub numer telefonu
Hasło
Nie pamiętasz nazwy konta?
Utwórz nowe konto
Wygląda na to, że ta funkcja była przez Ciebie wykorzystywana w zbyt szybki, niewłaściwy sposób. Możliwość korzystania z niej została w Twoim przypadku tymczasowo zablokowana.
Back
Polski
English (US)
Gaeilge
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Zezwolić na użycie plików cookie z Facebooka w tej przeglądarce?
Używamy plików cookie i podobnych technologii, by pomagać w dostarczaniu i ulepszaniu zawartości
Produktów Meta
. Wykorzystujemy je też do zapewniania większego bezpieczeństwa poprzez wykorzystywanie informacji pozyskiwanych z plików cookie na Facebooku i poza nim oraz do dostarczania osobom posiadającym konto Produktów Meta i ich ulepszania.
Niezbędne pliki cookie: Te pliki cookie są wymagane do korzystania z Produktów Meta. Są one konieczne do prawidłowego działania naszych witryn.
Pliki cookie innych firm: Używamy tych plików cookie, aby pokazywać Ci reklamy poza Produktami Meta i udostępniać takie funkcje jak mapy i filmy w Produktach Meta. Te pliki cookie są opcjonalne.
Masz kontrolę nad opcjonalnymi plikami cookie, z których korzystamy. W
Zasadach dotyczących plików cookie
możesz dowiedzieć się więcej o plikach cookie i sposobach ich wykorzystania,  a w dowolnej chwili sprawdzić lub zmienić swoje wybory.
Informacje o plikach cookie
Czym są pliki cookie?
Dowiedz się więcej
Dlaczego korzystamy z plików cookie?
Dowiedz się więcej
Czym są Produkty Meta?
Dowiedz się więcej
Twoje wybory dotyczące plików cookie
Dowiedz się więcej
Pliki cookie od innych firm
Używamy plików cookie
innych firm
, aby pokazywać Ci reklamy poza naszymi Produktami i udostępniać takie funkcje jak mapy, usługi płatnicze i filmy.
Wybierz pliki cookie według kategorii
Jak korzystamy z tych plików cookie
Jeśli zezwolisz na te pliki cookie
Jeśli nie zezwolisz na te pliki cookie
Inne sposoby kontrolowania Twoich informacji
Zarządzaj swoimi materiałami reklamowymi w Centrum kont
Więcej informacji na temat reklam internetowych
Kontrolowanie plików cookie za pomocą ustawień przeglądarki
Zezwól na wszystkie pliki cookie
Odrzuć opcjonalne pliki cookie
Zezwól na wszystkie pliki cookie
Odrzuć opcjonalne pliki cookie
Sub-policy 2
https://www.appsflyer.com/privacy-policy/:
Platform
Measure
Measurement suite
Measure every action on mobile, web and CTV
ROI measurement
Understand your true mobile marketing ROI
Creative Optimization
Unlock creative performance with the power of AI
Analyze
Marketing analytics
Turn insights on campaign performance into action
Incrementality
Prove the real value of your marketing campaigns
Engage
CX & deep linking
Boost revenue with exceptional customer experience
Audience segmentation
Create meaningful conversations with your customers
Protect
Fraud protection
Protect your marketing budget from mobile ad fraud
Collaborate
Privacy Cloud
Collaborate with your partners in a privacy-centric way
AppsFlyer Data Collaboration Platform
First-party data monetization that fuels retail media growth
Partner marketplace
Connect to over 10,000 tech and media partners
Interactive product tours
iOS 14+ solutions
Data feeds & APIs
Solutions
Team
Marketing
Product
Data & Analytics
R&D
Goal
Regain iOS visibility
Kickstart app growth
Scale user acquisition
Increase engagement & LTV
Maximize ROAS
Industry
Gaming
Shopping
Finance
Food & drink
Health & fitness
Travel
Platform
iOS
Android
PC & console
CTV & OTT
Web
Mobile
Web3
Partnerships
Tech and media partners
Agency partners
Partner Program
Interactive product tours
Customer stories
The AppsFlyer difference
Learn
Resources
Stay informed with industry insights, the latest trends, original content, and all things AppsFlyer
Ecosystem
Blog
Reports & guides
Events & webinars
Tools & templates
Industry benchmarks
Videos
Podcasts
Glossary
Metrics comparison
Customers
Customer stories
Product news
Use cases
Help center
Developer Hub
AppsFlyer Learning
Come to MAMA
Company
Who we are
Find out more about our history, our team, what we stand for, and why we do what we do
About us
Newsroom
CEO blog spot
Trust hub
Careers
Social impact
Contact
From our CEO
The future of our ecosystem and web
On privacy and user experience
Aggregated advanced privacy
Pricing
Login
Sign up free
Contact sales
Legal hub
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Documentation
MSA
Site Terms
Website Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
DPA
Opt Out
Processing Customer Data
Supplier Portal
Subprocessors
Modern Slavery Statement
Website Privacy Policy
Last updated May 28, 2024
This Privacy Policy applies to: (i) use of the AppsFlyer owned and operated Websites (appsflyer.com, onelink.me and their subdomains); (ii) our marketing activities including, registrations as part of webinars, conference events, emails etc.; and (iii) any other product or activity that links to, or otherwise references, this privacy policy (collectively, the “Marketing Platforms“). We respect your privacy rights and value your trust. This Privacy Policy describes how we collect, receive, use, store, share, transfer, and process your personal information, as well as your rights in determining what we do with the information that we collect or hold about you.
This Privacy Policy does not apply to information collected through use by customers of the AppsFlyer service, which is described under our
Services Privacy Policy
.
Information We Collect
When using or interacting with our Marketing Platforms, we may collect or receive the following types of information (collectively, “Information”).
“Personal Information” such as name, email, contact details or any other personal content that you provide to us whether through a form or field on our website or any other communication (e.g. email, phone, post etc.).
“Technical Information” such as browser type, operating system, device type, IP address and other similar technical information typically received from a browser or device automatically when visiting or interacting with our Marketing Platforms. This may include the referring URL that led you to our website.
“Usage Information” such as the pages you visited on our website, where you clicked, searches performed on our website and other similar information related to how you have used our website. It may also include information related to whether you receive, opened or clicked on any links in an email sent to you.
We understand that certain Technical information or Usage Information may, either alone or when combined with other data, be deemed personal data under various laws and jurisdictions and we are committed to treating such data in compliance with applicable laws.
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
Depending on the type of Information, we may collect or receive Information in the following ways:
When you voluntarily share Information with us. For example, when you register to one of our events, request that we contact you through our online forms, submit your CV, or when you request to receive certain content that we may make available (e.g. research and white papers).
Through use of cookies and other similar technologies (e.g. HTML5 Local Storage, LSO, web beacons, JavaScript, etc.). These technologies help us to analyze how our Marketing Platforms are used and to tailor content that is relevant to you. It also helps us to deliver more relevant advertisements to you on our own or third party sites. For more information on such technologies, including how to manage your cookie preferences please see our
Cookie Policy
.
Information obtained from third party sources. This includes Information received through the various business support tools and services that we use (e.g. marketing platforms, analytics services etc.) and public sources such as social media sites. We may combine the Information received through these sources with other Information we have in order to ensure our records are up to date and so that we are able to provide you with relevant content.
You have choices in how we collect and use Information. See the “
Your Choices
” section below for more information.
The Purposes
We use Information for the following purposes:
To process your inquiries and to respond to your requests. For example, when you contact us to learn more about our products or services or when you request to receive certain materials from us (e.g. white papers, research papers, product and services information). Additionally, if you submit your CV to us, we use it to evaluate your candidacy (including by assessing your qualifications and skills).
To send you information related to our services and products that we believe may interest you, such as newsletters or product and service updates. Such communications will be sent to you when you have chosen to receive such communication or when we have a legitimate interest to market our products and services. In any event, you will always be able to opt-out of receiving such communications. Opting out may be done either directly in the communication received or through the ways described in the instructions in the “
Your Choices
” section below.
To understand how you have used our Marketing Platforms and to customize them in accordance with your interests and past actions and choices. We do this based on our legitimate interest to operate our Marketing Platforms, diagnose any problems with the Marketing Platforms and to improve the Marketing Platforms and your experience when navigating through them.
In our legitimate interest to prevent fraud or harm to us or to any third party, and ensure the security of our network and services.
Where it is necessary for AppsFlyer to comply with its legal obligations and to exercise and enforce its legal rights.
We may use certain third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Who We Share Information With
In order to conduct our business and operate our Marketing Platforms, we may share Information with various third parties, such as:
Our subsidiary companies and global branches.
Third parties that help us operate our Marketing Platforms (e.g. hosting company, recruitment platforms and agencies, payment processors, business management and email distribution service providers and other similar service providers). These companies are authorized to use your personal information only as necessary to provide these services to us.
When required by law, such as to comply with court orders, search warrants, regulatory orders, subpoenas, and other lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements;
Legal authorities, consultants, advisors or service providers when required to investigate, respond to, or prevent, fraud; or when required to ensure the security of our network and services and protect the safety of AppsFlyer or the public.
As part of any merger or acquisition of AppsFlyer, Information may be transferred to the merging or acquiring company, as well as to any advisors representing a party during discussions of such merger or acquisition.
AppsFlyer resellers, agents, partners or service providers acting on our behalf in connection with the offering of AppsFlyer’s products or services.
Third-party marketing and advertising networks to help us market our products on our own website and on third party websites (e.g. remarketing ads across the Internet by Google).
Without derogating from the foregoing, AppsFlyer may publish general aggregate and unidentifiable information (e.g. statistical information) relating to use of its Marketing Platforms.
Cross Border Data Transfers and Mechanisms
We may need to transfer Information to countries where we and/or our service providers operate. Such countries may be different from the country in which the data originated and where data protection laws may not be equivalent to, or offer the same protection as, those in your country. By using our Marketing Platforms, you agree to any such transfers. In any event, where appropriate given the nature of services, we will put in place agreements with our service providers to ensure a level of privacy consistent with the terms of this policy.
With regards to the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred from the European Economic Area to the United States, please be assured that AppsFlyer continues to comply with all applicable laws in respect of such transfers and any data transfers to the United States will be governed by the Standard Contractual Clauses as set forth in our DPA with the relevant service provider.
AppsFlyer Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. AppsFlyer Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, as well as to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view AppsFlyer’s certification, please visit
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over AppsFlyer Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, and in case of onward transfer of data to third parties, AppsFlyer maintains liability.
In compliance with the DPF Principles, AppsFlyer is committed to resolving any complaints arising regarding our processing of your personal data. You may direct your queries to privacy@appsflyer.com and, in compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, we are committed to referring unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the DPF to Truste, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://trustarc.com/dispute-resolution/
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of Truste are provided at no cost to you and allow for binding arbitration.
Protecting Your Information
We strive to meet the highest standards of security measures across our business units. We have implemented appropriate technical and organizational measures based on industry-leading standards. Such measures are designed to protect against unauthorized access or unlawful processing of Personal Information and against accidental loss, destruction or damage of Personal Information. As part of such measures, we have established various policies and procedures that guide us, including in respect of asset management, access management, physical security, people security, product security, cloud and network infrastructure security, third-party security, vulnerability management, security monitoring, and incident response.
Information Storage and Retention
We may store Information on our own servers as well as those operated by third party data hosting providers. As specified in Section 5 above (Cross Border Transfers), such servers may be located worldwide. We will only retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary to pursue the purpose of the collection. We may also retain your Personal Information for such time needed to pursue our legitimate business interests, in connection with any legal claims and compliance with legal obligations. When we use your information for direct marketing purposes, we will retain your data until you opt-out from receiving the marketing materials; provided that we will need to retain certain information to maintain a record of your request.
Modifications to This Policy
AppsFlyer may amend this Privacy Policy at any time, provided that in the event of a material change we shall provide notice on this page and/or a note near the link to this page. The updates shall apply immediately for new Information collected or provided as of the day of the update and following thirty (30) days for any Information collected or provided to AppsFlyer prior to the update date. If you do not agree to the terms of the new policy you are requested to contact the Legal Department using the contact details listed in Section 11 below. We encourage you to periodically review this page for any updates.
Your Choices
We provide you with various choices on how we may use Information in connection with: (i) our marketing activities; and (ii) our use of cookies and similar technologies to serve your interest-based advertisements and to analyze usage of our Marketing Platforms.
You may choose to stop receiving our newsletter or marketing emails by following the unsubscribe instructions included in these emails, accessing the email preferences in your account settings page, or you can contact us at
https://www.appsflyer.com/company/contact/
. You can manage your preferences related to our use of cookies and similar technologies that we use, among other things, to provide you with targeted interest-based advertisements and to analyze your use of our Marketing Platforms – please see our
Cookie Policy
for instructions. Additionally, certain advertisers (including Google) we work with may be members of NAI and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance. You may opt-out from such advertisers’ services here or at the following link:
https://youradchoices.com/
In addition, the laws of some jurisdictions may provide you with various rights in connection with our processing of certain Information. Such rights may include:
The right to withdraw any previously provided consent;
The right to access certain information about you that we process;
The right to have us correct or update any Personal Information;
The right to have certain Information erased;
The right to have us temporarily block our processing of certain Information;
The right to have Information exported into common machine-readable format;
The right to object to our processing of Information in cases of direct marketing, or when we rely on legitimate interests as our lawful basis to process your information; and
The right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate data protection authority.
We will respond to your requests within a reasonable timeframe. Please note these rights may be limited in certain circumstances as provided by applicable law. For any additional information regarding such rights or to exercise any such rights please contact AppsFlyer at: privacy@appsflyer.com
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
Social Media and Third Party Services
Our website may offer a blog with ‘comments’ section and various social media features, such as a ‘share’ button or links to third party websites and services, including Twitter, LinkedIn, Google+ and Facebook. When using any such features, certain information may be collected by such third parties, including your IP address or which page you are visiting on our website, and such third parties may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Any data collected by such third parties is governed by such third party’s privacy policy. You are encouraged to carefully review such third party privacy policies.
Children’s Privacy
AppsFlyer does not knowingly collect or process personal data from or with respect to children under the age of 16, and you must be 16 years of age or older in order to establish an account for AppsFlyer’s Services. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe that your child under the age of 16 has submitted his or her personal data or other data without your consent, permission, or authorization – please let us know immediately, and we will promptly act to remove your child’s data from our database, cease the use of such data and inform any other party we suspect to have access to such data to do the same.
California Privacy Rights
We may collect personal information about California residents who are afforded additional rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 et seq. (the “CCPA“). If you are a California resident, you can see more details about the types of personal information we have collected from you in the past 12 months and may collect from you in Section 1 above (
Information We Collect
) and how we collect such personal information in Section 2 above (
The Methods We Use to Collect and Receive Information
). The purposes for which we collect your personal information are further described in Section 3 above (
The Purpose
). We do not share your personal information with any third party except as further described in Section 4 above (
Who We Share Information With
). Please refer to the other terms of this Privacy Policy to see further rights afforded to you and how we use your personal information.
We do not “Sell” (as defined in the CCPA) your personal information which we have collected or may collect and in the event we will Sell your personal information, we will notify you by updating this Privacy Policy in accordance with Section 8 above (
Modifications to this Policy
) and we will provide you with the option of opting out of such “sale”.
You, as a California resident, have certain rights regarding your personal information pursuant to the CCPA, subject to certain restrictions under applicable laws, including the rights to access your personal information, to delete your personal information, and to opt out of the “sale” of your personal data. You may request any of these by contacting us via email at
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. Upon your request, we will verify that you are the person making this request and in order to do so, we may request identification documents from you.
Contacting Us
If you have any questions or concerns about this Website Privacy Policy, the information we collect, the practices of AppsFlyer, or your dealings with the Marketing Platforms, please contact us or our Data Protection Officer by sending an email to:
privacy@appsflyer.com
or by physical mail to: AppsFlyer Ltd. (Attn: Legal Dept.) 14 Maskit St., Herzliya, Israel. For the purposes of Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation, the representative within the EU of AppsFlyer is AppsFlyer Germany Schönhauser Allee 180, 10119 Berlin, Germany (contact
privacy@appsflyer.com
; +49 30 166373500).
Sub-policy 3
https://yieldbird.com/privacy-policy/:
Yieldbird Platform
Price Genius
Prebid Stack
Unfilled Recovery
Refresher
Viewability Tools
How to start
Case studies
Research Hub
Blog
Reports
Webinars
About
Login
Contact us
Privacy Policy
DEFINITIONS
Administrator:
“YIELDBIRD” spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością with its seat in Warsaw,
					at ul. Czerska 8/10, registered in the Register of Entrepreneurs maintained by the District Court for the
					capital city of Warsaw in Warsaw, 13
th
Commercial Division of the National Court Register under the National Court Register No. 0000324436; share
					capital in the amount of PLN 47,550.00 (forty seven thousand five hundred fifty zloty); Tax ID No. [NIP]: 679
					299 6939,
Personal data:
any information on an identified or possible to be identified natural person
					by one or a few special aspects defining the physical, physiological, genetic, mental, economic, cultural or
					social identity of the natural person, including the IP No. of the device, data on the location, Internet
					identifier and information gathered via cookie files and another similar technology.
Policy:
this Privacy Policy.
GDPR:
the Regulation of the European Parliament and of the Council (EU) 2016/679 of 07 April
					2016 on the protection of natural persons with regard to the processing of personal data and on the free
					movement of such data, and repealing Directive 95/46/EC.
Website:
the on-line website and mobile applications broadcast by the Administrator, which
					this Policy shall be applied to.
User:
any natural person visiting the Website or using one or more services or
					functionalities rendered available at the Website.
DATA PROCESSING IN CONNECTION WITH THE USE OF THE WEBSITE
In connection with the use of the Website by the User, the Administrator shall gather data in the scope
					necessary for rendering particular services offered at the Website as well as the information on the User's
					activity at the Website. Detailed principles and objectives of processing of personal data gathered during the
					User's use of the Website are described below.
OBJECTIVES AND LEGAL GROUNDS FOR DATA PROCESSING AT THE WEBSITE
Use of the Website
Personal data of all persons using the Website (including the IP address or other identifiers and information
					gathered via cookies files or other similar technologies) and not being the registered Users (i.e. persons who
					do not have an account or a profile at the Website) shall be processed by the Administrator:
for the purpose of rendering electronic services in the scope of giving access to the content of the Website
						to the Users – the necessity of processing in order to perform the agreement constitutes the legal grounds
						for processing (Article 6 section 1 letter b) of GDPR,
for analytical and statistical purposes – the Administrator's substantiated interest, consisting in the
						performance of analyses of the Users' activity and their preferences, for the purpose of correction of
						functionalities applied and services rendered, shall constitute the legal basis for processing (Article 6
						section 1 letter f) of GDPR;
for the purpose of possible determination, seeking or defending claims – the Administrator's substantiated
						interest, consisting in defending its rights, shall constitute the legal basis for processing (Article 6
						section 1 letter f);
for the Administrator's and other entities' marketing purposes, in particular in connection with the
						presentation of the behavioural advertisement – the principles of personal data processing for marketing
						purposes are described in the
MARKETING
The User's activity at the Website, including their personal data, shall be registered in system logs (a
					special computer programme used for storing chronological records, containing information on events and
					actions relating to the IT system used for rendering services by the Administrator). Information gathered in
					logs shall be processed mainly for purposes connected with rendering services. The Administrator also
					processes the data for technical, administrative purposes, for purposes of ensuring the security of the IT
					system and the IT system management, as well as for analytical and statistical purposes – the Administrator's
					substantiated interest shall constitute the legal basis for processing in this respect (Article 6, section 1,
					letter f) of GDPR.
Contact Forms
The Administrator shall ensure the possibility of contacting the Administrator with the use of electronic
					contact forms. The use of the form shall require providing personal data necessary to contact the User and to
					provide the response to the inquiry. The User may also provide other data in order to facilitate contact or
					handle the inquiry. The provision of data marked as obligatory shall be required to accept and handle the
					inquiry and the failure to provide thereof shall result in the lack of possibility of handling the inquiry.
					Provision of the remaining data is voluntary.
Personal data are processed:
In order to identify the sender and handle the inquiry sent via the form – the necessity to process in order
						to perform the services agreement shall constitute the legal grounds for processing (Article 6, section 1,
						letter b) of GDPR;
For analytical and statistical purposes – the substantiated interest of the Administrator, consisting in
						keeping the statistics of inquiries submitted by Users via the Website, in order to improve the
						functionalities thereof, shall constitute the legal basis for processing (Article 6 section 1 letter f) of
						GDPR;
MARKETING
The Administrator shall process the Users' personal data for the purpose of implementing marketing actions
					which may consist in:
Sending e-mail notifications on interesting offers or contents, which in some cases contain commercial
						information (newsletter service),
Newsletter
The Administrator renders the newsletter service to persons who provided their e-mail address for that
					purpose. Provision of data shall be required for the purpose of rendering the newsletter service and the
					failure to provide thereof shall result in the lack of possibility of sending thereof.
Personal data shall be processed:
for the purpose of rendering the newsletter sending service – the necessity of processing to perform the
						agreement shall constitute the legal grounds for processing (Article 6, section 1, letter b) of GDPR);
in case of sending marketing contents within the framework of the newsletter to the User – the
						Administrator's substantiated interest shall constitute the legal basis for processing, including profiling
						(Article 6, section 1, letter f) of GDPR), in connection with the consent expressed for receiving the
						newsletter;
for analytical and statistical purposes – the Administrator's substantiated interest, consisting in
						performance of analyses of the Users' activity at the Website, for the purpose of improvement of
						functionalities applied, shall constitute the legal basis for processing (Article 6 section 1 letter f) of
						GDPR);
for the purpose of possible determination, seeking or defending claims – the Administrator's substantiated
						interest shall constitute the legal basis for processing (Article 6 section 1 letter f);
SOCIAL MEDIA
The Administrator shall process personal data of Users visiting the Administrator's profiles run in social
					media (Facebook, LinkedIn, Twitter). The data shall be processed only in connection with keeping the profile,
					including for the purpose of informing the Users about the Administrator's activity and promoting events,
					services and products of various kinds. The Administrator's substantiated interest consisting in the promotion
					of its own brand shall constitute the legal basis for personal data processing by the Administrator (Article
					6, section 1, letter f) of GDPR.
COOKIE FILES AND SIMILAR TECHNOLOGY
Cookie files are small text files, installed at the device of the User viewing the Website. Cookies usually
					contain the name of the website domain which they come from, the time of storage thereof at the user's device
					and the unique number. In this Policy information pertaining to cookies applies also to similar technologies
					used within the framework of the Website.
“Service” cookies
The Administrator shall use the so-called service cookies mainly for the purpose of providing the User with
					services rendered in an electronic manner and for the purpose of the services' quality improvement. Therefore,
					the Administrator and other entities rendering analytical and statistical services thereto use cookie files,
					storing the information or obtaining the access to information already stored in the User's telecommunications
					device (computer, telephone, tablet etc.). Cookies used for that purpose comprise:
Cookies with the data introduced by the User (session identifier) for the session duration (user input
						cookies);
Authentication cookies used for services which require authentication for the duration of the session;
Cookies used for assuring security e.g. used for detecting abuse as regards authentication (user centric
						security cookies);
Multimedia player session cookies (e.g. flash player cookies) for the duration of the session;
User interface customization cookies, for the duration of the session or slightly longer,
Cookies used for monitoring of traffic at the website i.e. data analytics, including:
“Marketing” cookies
The Controller may also use cookies for marketing purposes, including sending behavioural advertisements to
					the Users. To this end, the Controller may store information and access information which is already stored in
					a telecommunications end device of the User (computer, telephone, tablet, etc.).
The Controller may also use re-targeting and re-marketing tags which recognise and give information to
						different third party cookies. These tags personalise Customer experience and the advertisements displayed
						to Customer based off Customer activity across any other websites using the same tags.
The use of cookies and personal information collected by means of cookies for marketing purposes, especially
					as far as promotion of third-party services and products is concerned, requires the User's consent. The
					consent may be withdrawn at any time. The legal grounds for processing Personal Data shall be the Controller's
					legitimate interest (Article 6(1)(f) of the GDPR), in connection with the User's consent.
More information about cookies
In many cases software used for browsing web pages (web browser) accepts the storage cookies on the User's end
					device by default. The Website Users may at any time change the cookie settings. In particular, the settings
					can be changed so that the automatic use of cookies is blocked or the User is notified of each individual case
					of placing a cookie file on the Website User's device. Detailed information on the possibilities and manners
					of using cookies is available in the software (web browser) settings. Failure to change the cookie settings
					means that cookies will be placed on the User's end device and thus the Controller will store and access
					information about the User's end device.
– Google Analytics cookies (i.e. cookies used by the Google company – i.e. the entity which the Administrator
					entrusted with personal data processing – for the purpose of performing the analysis of the manner of using
					the Website by the User, including preparation of statistics and reports concerning the Website functioning).
PERSONAL DATA PROCESSING PERIOD
The period of data processing by the Administrator depends on the kind of the service rendered and the
					objective of processing. In principle, data are processed within the time of the service provision or order
					implementation by the time of withdrawal of the consent expressed or raising an effective objection against
					data processing in cases when the Administrator's substantiated interest constitutes the legal basis for data
					processing.
Data processing period may be extended in case if processing is necessary to determine, seek or defend against
					possible claims and after that period only in case and in the scope in which this is required under legal
					regulations. Upon the lapse of the processing period, data are irrevocably removed or anonymized.
USER RIGHTS
The User shall have the right of access to data contents and to request the correction, removal, limitation of
					processing thereof, the right of transfer the data and the right of raising an objection against data
					processing as well as the right of filing a complaint to the supervision authority competent for personal data
					protection.
To the extent to which the User's data are processed under the consent, the consent may be withdrawn at any
					moment, by means of contacting the Administrator.
Right of objection
At any moment the User shall have the right to raise an objection against processing of their data for
							direct marketing purposes, including profiling, if the processing takes place in connection with the
							Administrator's substantiated interest.
The User shall also have the right, at any moment, to raise an objection against the processing of their
							data for reasons related to their special situation in cases when the Administrator's substantiated
							interest constitutes the legal basis for processing (e.g. in connection with implementation of analytical
							and statistical objectives, including profiling).
More information on rights resulting from GDPR may be found in personal data processing policy constituting an
					appendix to this Policy and available also at the address
Transparency Policy
.
DATA RECIPIENTS
In connection with performance of services, personal data shall be disclosed to external entities, including
					in particular to suppliers responsible for handling IT systems used for rendering services and to entities
					related to the Administrator, including the companies from its group,
In case of obtaining the User's consent, their data may be rendered available also to other entities for their
					own purposes, including marketing purposes.
The Administrator reserves the right to disclose the information concerning the User to competent authorities
					or third parties which raise a request for providing such information, based on relevant legal grounds and in
					accordance with applicable legal regulations.
TRANSFER OF DATA OUTSIDE THE EUROPEAN ECONOMIC AREA
The level of personal data protection outside the European Economic Area (EEA) differs from the one ensured by
					the European law. For the aforementioned reason, the Administrator shall transfer personal data outside the
					EEA only when this is necessary and assuring a relevant level of protection, in particular by means of:
cooperation with personal data processing entities in countries with respect to which a relevant decision of
						the European Commission was issued;
the application of standard contractual clauses issued by the European Commission;
the application of binding corporate rules approved by a competent supervision body;
The Administrator always informs about the intention of transferring personal data outside the EEA at the
					stage of collection thereof.
PERSONAL DATA SECURITY
The Administrator carries out, on regular basis, the risk analysis for the purpose of ensuring that the
					personal data are processed by the Administrator in a secure manner which assures, above all, that only
					authorized persons have access to the data and only in the scope in which it is necessary due to the tasks
					performed by them. The Administrator cares for all the operations with the use of personal data to be
					registered and made only by authorized employees and colleagues.
The Administrator takes up any necessary measures for its subcontractors and other cooperating entities to
					provide the guarantee of application of relevant security measures in each case of processing personal data at
					the Administrator's order.
CONTACT DETAILS
Contact with the Administrator is possible via the e-mail address:
iodo@yieldbird.com
or via mail to the address:
					“YIELDBIRD” spółka z ograniczoną odpowiedzialnością with its seat in Warsaw, ul. Czerska 8/10.
The data Administrator appointed the Personal Data Inspector which may be contacted via e-mail address:
iodo@yieldbird.com
with respect to any matter
					concerning personal data protection.
AMENDMENTS TO THE PRIVACY POLICY
The Policy is verified on regular basis and updated if necessary. The current version of the Policy was
					adopted on and it applies from 23 May 2018.
We Care About Your Privacy
We and our
878
partners store and/or access information on a device, such as unique IDs in cookies to process personal data. You may accept or manage your choices by clicking below, including your right to object where legitimate interest is used, or at any time in the privacy policy page. These choices will be signaled to our partners and will not affect browsing data.
We and our partners process data to provide:
Use precise geolocation data. Actively scan device characteristics for identification. Store and/or access information on a device. Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.
List of Partners (vendors)
Reject All
I Accept
Settings
About Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent and legitimate interest. You may exercise your right to consent or object to a legitimate interest, based on a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
More information
Allow All
Manage Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Store and/or access information on a device
Cookies, device or similar online identifiers (e.g. login-based identifiers, randomly assigned identifiers, network based identifiers) together with other information (e.g. browser type and information, language, screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
Use limited data to select advertising
661 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Create profiles for personalised advertising
533 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (such as forms you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on this service and other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
531 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on this service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
View Illustrations
Create profiles to personalise content
234 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (for instance, forms you submit, non-advertising content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (such as your previous activity on this service or other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (which might for example include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present content that appears more relevant based on your possible interests, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised content
208 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on your content personalisation profiles, which can reflect your activity on this or other services (for instance, the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects. This can for example be used to adapt the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find (non-advertising) content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Measure advertising performance
770 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Measure content performance
381 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which content is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine whether the (non-advertising) content e.g. reached its intended audience and matched your interests. For instance, whether you read an article, watch a video, listen to a podcast or look at a product description, how long you spent on this service and the web pages you visit etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of (non-advertising) content that is shown to you.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
483 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Reports can be generated based on the combination of data sets (like user profiles, statistics, market research, analytics data) regarding your interactions and those of other users with advertising or (non-advertising) content to identify common characteristics (for instance, to determine which target audiences are more receptive to an ad campaign or to certain contents).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Develop and improve services
571 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Use limited data to select content
144 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type, or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times a video or an article is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
List of IAB Vendors‎
Use precise geolocation data
With your acceptance, your precise location (within a radius of less than 500 metres) may be used in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
With your acceptance, certain characteristics specific to your device might be requested and used to distinguish it from other devices (such as the installed fonts or plugins, the resolution of your screen) in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Certain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Information about your activity on this service may be matched and combined with other information relating to you and originating from various sources (for instance your activity on a separate online service, your use of a loyalty card in-store, or your answers to a survey), in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
In support of the purposes explained in this notice, your device might be considered as likely linked to other devices that belong to you or your household (for instance because you are logged in to the same service on both your phone and your computer, or because you may use the same Internet connection on both devices).
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends when accessing the Internet (for instance, the IP address of your Internet connection or the type of browser you are using) in support of the purposes exposed in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 4
https://consumer.huawei.com/pl/privacy/privacy-policy/:
Akceptuj wszystkie pliki cookie
Odrzuć wszystkie
Ustawienia plików cookie
Ukryj szczegóły
Używamy cookies i podobnych narzędzi, które są niezbędne do uruchomienia podstawowych funkcji strony internetowej i świadczenia żądanej usługi. Jeśli wyrazisz na to zgodę, będziemy również wykorzystywać cookies, które obejmują
cookies pierwszej i trzeciej strony
, aby analizować Twoje działania online w celu poprawy wydajności naszej witryny i dostarczania reklam na podstawie Twojego unikalnego identyfikatora i aktywności online, zgodnie z naszą
Polityką plików cookie
. Możesz zmienić swoje wybory w dowolnym momencie, klikając Ustawienia plików cookie znajdujące się na dole strony. Aby dowiedzieć się więcej o tym, w jaki sposób i do jakich celów wykorzystujemy dane osobowe, odwiedź naszą
Politykę prywatności
.
Preferencje dotyczące prywatności
Prywatność użytkownika
Niezbędne pliki cookie
Te pliki są niezbędne do działania witryny i nie mogą być wyłączone w naszych systemach. Zwykle są one umieszczane w odpowiedzi na działania użytkownika stanowiące prośbę o usługi, np. wybieranie ustawień prywatności, logowanie lub wypełnianie formularzy. Można ustawić w przeglądarce blokowanie takich plików cookie lub powiadamianie o nich, ale w takim przypadku niektóre części witryny nie będą działać. Te pliki cookie nie przechowują żadnych danych osobowych umożliwiających identyfikację.
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
cookieBannerOnOff
Dostawca:
id-dre.dbankcdn.com
Nazwa:
consumer-tkbdownload-dg_ctkbfm_sticky
Dostawca:
consumer-tkbdownload.huawei.com
Nazwa:
qrCodeCreateTime
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
cversion
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
CAS_THEME_NAME
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
expiredTime
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
cookieBannerOnOff
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
VERSION_NO
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
qRCode
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
cbg_price_mgr_sticky
Dostawca:
cbg.huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
cbg.huawei.com
Nazwa:
50182_currentLanguage
Dostawca:
celia-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
50183_currentLanguage
Dostawca:
celia-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWSTORE-SESSION
Dostawca:
itrinity-de.c.huawei.com
Nazwa:
hwsso_login
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
hwsso_uniportal
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
ccpce-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
consumer-tkbdownload.huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
ccpc-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
ztsg_ruuid
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
JSESSIONID
Dostawca:
consumer-tkb.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWSTORE-SESSION
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
CookieInformationConsent
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Funkcjonalne
Funkcjonalne pliki cookie ułatwiają zapisywanie informacji, która zmienia wygląd lub działanie witryny. Na przykład wybrany język lub region.
Nazwa:
cookies.js
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Analityczne pliki cookie
Te pliki cookie pozwalają nam liczyć wizyty i źródła ruchu, abyśmy mogli mierzyć i usprawniać wydajność naszej witryny. Pomagają nam w rozpoznawaniu, które strony są najmniej i najbardziej popularne, i pozwalają zobaczyć, w jaki sposób goście poruszają się po witrynie. Wszystkie informacje zbierane przez te pliki cookie są zagregowane i tym samym anonimowe. Jednakże inne firmy zapewniające te usługi, Google Analytics, będą przetwarzać dane osobowe użytkownika, aby zapewnić zagregowane dane.
Nazwa:
_dc_gtm_UA-xxxxxxxx
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gat_xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gclxxxx
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gd#############
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gid
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
s_xxxx
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_mk
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_nnnnnnnnnnnnn
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_s
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_vars
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
first_utm
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
last_utm
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
prevpagetime
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
prevScrollPercentage
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
scrollPercentage
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
starttime
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
scrollPercentage
Dostawca:
consumer-res.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_c
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_ex
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_id
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_cs_optout
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gat_newhuaiweisupport
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gid
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_ga_xxx
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
ayl_visitor
Dostawca:
.omnitagjs.com
Nazwa:
_ga
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_ga_xxx
Dostawca:
consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_ga_xxx
Dostawca:
.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_gat
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_dc_gtm_UA-xxx-xxx
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Reklamowe pliki cookie
Te pliki cookie mogą być ustawiane przez naszych partnerów reklamowych za pośrednictwem naszej strony internetowej. Mogą one być wykorzystywane przez te firmy do budowania profilu zainteresowań użytkownika i wyświetlania odpowiednich reklam na innych stronach. Nie przechowują one bezpośrednio danych osobowych, lecz opierają się na jednoznacznej identyfikacji przeglądarki i sprzętu internetowego. Jeśli użytkownik nie zezwoli na stosowanie tych plików cookie, doświadcza mniej ukierunkowanych reklam.
Nazwa:
_fbp
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
Dostawca:
www.facebook.com
Nazwa:
_rxuuid
Dostawca:
1rx.io
Nazwa:
_cs_nnnnnnnnnnnnn
Dostawca:
t.contentsquare.net
Nazwa:
tuuid
Dostawca:
360yield.com
Nazwa:
tuuid_lu
Dostawca:
360yield.com
Nazwa:
um
Dostawca:
360yield.com
Nazwa:
umeh
Dostawca:
360yield.com
Nazwa:
INGRESSCOOKIE
Dostawca:
bh.contextweb.com
Nazwa:
CONSENT
Dostawca:
youtube-nocookie.com
Nazwa:
IDSYNC
Dostawca:
analytics.yahoo.com
Nazwa:
CCMSESSID
Dostawca:
clickonometrics.pl
Nazwa:
SERVERID
Dostawca:
clickonometrics.pl
Nazwa:
c
Dostawca:
t.visx.net
Nazwa:
tuuid
Dostawca:
t.visx.net
Nazwa:
tuuid_lu
Dostawca:
t.visx.net
Nazwa:
um2
Dostawca:
t.visx.net
Nazwa:
i
Dostawca:
openx.net
Nazwa:
cookieJartestCookie
Dostawca:
sync.outbrain.com
Nazwa:
u
Dostawca:
creativecdn.com
Nazwa:
obuid
Dostawca:
outbrain.com
Nazwa:
__cf_bm
Dostawca:
mgid.com
Nazwa:
APID
Dostawca:
advertising.com
Nazwa:
A3
Dostawca:
yahoo.com
Nazwa:
APIDTS
Dostawca:
yahoo.com
Nazwa:
B
Dostawca:
yahoo.com
Nazwa:
__auid
Dostawca:
admixer.co.kr
Nazwa:
__id_inf_131
Dostawca:
admixer.co.kr
Nazwa:
__id_utm
Dostawca:
admixer.co.kr
Nazwa:
__puid_131
Dostawca:
admixer.co.kr
Nazwa:
tluid
Dostawca:
3lift.com
Nazwa:
yieldmo_id
Dostawca:
yieldmo.com
Nazwa:
tuuid
Dostawca:
bidswitch.net
Nazwa:
tuuid_lu
Dostawca:
bidswitch.net
Nazwa:
Gtest
Dostawca:
hit.gemius.pl
Nazwa:
uuid
Dostawca:
tpmn.co.kr
Nazwa:
t_gid
Dostawca:
taboola.com
Nazwa:
VID
Dostawca:
mail.ru
Nazwa:
stx_user_id
Dostawca:
sharethrough.com
Nazwa:
PUBMDCID
Dostawca:
pubmatic.com
Nazwa:
c
Dostawca:
bidswitch.net
Nazwa:
_dtm_trlnk_tracking_url
Dostawca:
huawei.com
Nazwa:
viewer_token
Dostawca:
csync.loopme.me
Nazwa:
mg_sync
Dostawca:
cm.mgid.com
Nazwa:
cct
Dostawca:
adscale.de
Nazwa:
rtbhs
Dostawca:
outbrain.com
Nazwa:
APID
Dostawca:
yahoo.com
Nazwa:
UID
Dostawca:
adx.opera.com
Nazwa:
gdpr_status
Dostawca:
media.net
Nazwa:
acc_segment
Dostawca:
csr.onet.pl
Nazwa:
rtbhouse
Dostawca:
tpmn.co.kr
Nazwa:
KRTBCOOKIE_xxxx
Dostawca:
pubmatic.com
Nazwa:
PugT
Dostawca:
pubmatic.com
Nazwa:
mf_red_key
Dostawca:
mobfox.com
Nazwa:
mf_u_key
Dostawca:
mobfox.com
Nazwa:
test_cookie
Dostawca:
doubleclick.net
Nazwa:
anj
Dostawca:
adnxs.com
Nazwa:
uuid2
Dostawca:
adnxs.com
Nazwa:
XANDR_PANID
Dostawca:
adnxs.com
Nazwa:
__cflb
Dostawca:
fast.nexx360.io
Nazwa:
uu
Dostawca:
adscale.de
Nazwa:
tu
Dostawca:
ih.adscale.de
Nazwa:
g
Dostawca:
.creativecdn.com
Nazwa:
IDE
Dostawca:
.doubleclick.net
Nazwa:
HAPLB8G
Dostawca:
.go.sonobi.com
Nazwa:
Rp
Dostawca:
.rmp.rakuten.com
Nazwa:
_cs_mk
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
CMPS
Dostawca:
.casalemedia.com
Nazwa:
PugT
Dostawca:
.pubmatic.com
Nazwa:
am-uid
Dostawca:
.admixer.net
Nazwa:
viewer_token
Dostawca:
.csync.loopme.me
Nazwa:
uid
Dostawca:
.connectad.io
Nazwa:
ar_debug
Dostawca:
.doubleclick.net
Nazwa:
statid
Dostawca:
.wp.pl
Nazwa:
rtbhouseuid
Dostawca:
.wp.pl
Nazwa:
KRTBCOOKIE_xxx
Dostawca:
.pubmatic.com
Nazwa:
a307080
Dostawca:
.console.adtarget.com.tr
Nazwa:
__Secure-ROLLOUT_TOKEN
Dostawca:
.youtube.com
Nazwa:
_gcl_au
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
_fbp
Dostawca:
.huawei.com
Nazwa:
c
Dostawca:
.creativecdn.com
Nazwa:
udmts
Dostawca:
.udmserve.net
Nazwa:
CMID
Dostawca:
.casalemedia.com
Nazwa:
C
Dostawca:
.adform.net
Nazwa:
UID
Dostawca:
.adx.opera.com
Nazwa:
YSC
Dostawca:
.youtube.com
Nazwa:
VISITOR_INFO1_LIVE
Dostawca:
.youtube.com
Nazwa:
ts
Dostawca:
.creativecdn.com
Nazwa:
dt
Dostawca:
.udmserve.net
Nazwa:
rtbh
Dostawca:
.udmserve.net
Nazwa:
CMPRO
Dostawca:
.casalemedia.com
Nazwa:
n360-rtbhouse
Dostawca:
.nexx360.io
Nazwa:
VP
Dostawca:
.contextweb.com
Nazwa:
vmuid
Dostawca:
.console.adtarget.com.tr
Nazwa:
uid
Dostawca:
.adform.net
Nazwa:
id
Dostawca:
.connectad.io
Nazwa:
VISITOR_PRIVACY_METADATA
Dostawca:
.youtube.com
Nazwa:
ar_debug
Dostawca:
.creativecdn.com
Nazwa:
receive-cookie-deprecation
Dostawca:
.adnxs.com
Nazwa:
receive-cookie-deprecation
Dostawca:
.doubleclick.net
Nietajne
Trwa proces utajniania nietajnych plików cookie przy współpracy z dostawcami poszczególnych plików cookie.
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
ccpce-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
img01.huaweifile.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
itrinity-de.c.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
celia-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
iforum-de.c.huawei.com
Nazwa:
TEST-COOKIE
Dostawca:
.inmobi.com
Nazwa:
CAS_THEME_NAME
Dostawca:
.id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
sgw-de.c.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
itrinity-de.c.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
ccpce-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
iid
Dostawca:
.inmobi.com
Nazwa:
consumer-tkb-dg_huawei_com_weknow_sticky
Dostawca:
.consumer-tkb.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
img01.huaweifile.com
Nazwa:
VERSION_NO
Dostawca:
.id7.cloud.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESID
Dostawca:
celia-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
50182_visitor_mode_on
Dostawca:
celia-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
50182_venusConversationIdConfig
Dostawca:
celia-de.consumer.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
sgw-de.c.huawei.com
Nazwa:
HWWAFSESTIME
Dostawca:
iforum-de.c.huawei.com
Kiedy odwiedzasz jakąkolwiek stronę internetową, może ona przechowywać lub pobierać informacje z Twojej przeglądarki, głównie w formie plików cookie. Informacje te mogą dotyczyć Ciebie, Twoich preferencji lub Twojego urządzenia i są wykorzystywane głównie po to, aby strona działała zgodnie z Twoimi oczekiwaniami. Informacje te zazwyczaj nie pozwalają na bezpośrednią identyfikację użytkownika, ale mogą zapewnić bardziej spersonalizowane doświadczenia internetowe. Ponieważ szanujemy Twoje prawo do prywatności, możesz zrezygnować z niektórych rodzajów plików cookie. Kliknij na nagłówek wybranej kategorii, aby dowiedzieć się więcej i wybrać pliki cookie, które chcesz zakceptować. Jeśli nie zezwolisz na stosowanie tych plików cookie, doświadczysz mniej ukierunkowanych reklam.
Więcej informacji
Zapisz ustawienia
Funkcjonalne
Analityczne pliki cookie
Reklamowe pliki cookie
Zasady zachowania poufności informacji (Polska)
Ostatnia aktualizacja: 8 sierpnia 2023 r.
Administratorem danych w ramach niniejszej Platformy oraz jej operatorem jest Huawei Polska Sp. z o.o., spółka zarejestrowana w Polsce i działająca zgodnie z polskim prawem, z siedzibą pod adresem Horizon Plaza, Domaniewska 39A, 02-672 Warszawa, (w dalszej części tekstu określanajako „Huawei” lub „my” w odpowiedniej formie gramatycznej).
Przywiązujemy dużą wagę do ochrony prywatności użytkowników. Zachęcamy do starannego zapoznania się z niniejszą Polityką prywatności, aby zrozumieć, w jaki sposób przetwarzamy dane osobowe naszych użytkowników.
W niniejszym dokumencie omówiono następujące zagadnienia:
1.
Jakie dane na temat użytkownika zbieramy
2.
W jaki sposób wykorzystujemy dane użytkownika
3.
W jaki sposób udostępniamy dane użytkownika
4.
Jak długo przechowujemy dane użytkownika
5.
Jakie użytkownik ma prawa i możliwości wyboru
6.
Aktualizacje niniejszej Polityki
1. Jakie dane na temat użytkownika zbieramy
Możemy zbierać i przetwarzać następujące dane osobowe użytkownika zależnie od rodzaju usług używanych w ramach tej platformy:
(1)Informacje o urządzeniu: numer seryjny (SN), informacje o przeglądarce, model urządzenia, wersja systemu operacyjnego i dane zachowane w pamięci ROM urządzenia, rozmiar i rozdzielczość ekranu, kod kraju mobilnego oraz ustawienia językowe;
(2) Informacje o sieci: adres IP, rodzaj sieci, informacje o operatorze sieci i status połączenia sieciowego, informacje o lokalizacji.
(3) Informacje o koncie związane z usługą Huawei ID, zwane dalej informacją o koncie: dane osobowe ujawniane przez podmiot stowarzyszony Huawei, jakim jest
Aspiegel
SE z siedzibą w Dublinie, Irlandii, na temat Huawei ID użytkownika, w tym zdjęcie profilowe i pseudonim, UID (numer identyfikacyjny użytkownika), data urodzenia, kraj, płeć, adres e-mail lub numer telefonu, hasło
(4) Informacje o zamówieniu: dane kontaktowe (imię i nazwisko, numer telefonu, kod pocztowy, adres wysyłkowy, adres e-mail, adres na fakturze, imię i nazwisko płatnika, NIP) oraz numer zamówienia generowany na tej podstawie, informacje dotyczące produktu.
(5) Informacje o płatności: takie jak imię i nazwisko płatnika, forma płatności, numer transakcji, powiadomienie o poprawnej wpłacie, data wpłaty, data przyjęcia wpłaty, numer karty, imię i nazwisko właściciela, datę ważności karty. Nie przechowujemy wrażliwych danych dotyczących płatności, takich jak kod CVV. W celu zrealizowania płatności generujemy numer płatności.
(6) Informacje o dostawie: numer wysyłki generowany przez nas i numer do śledzenia przesyłki generowany przez firmę kurierską.
(7) Treść oceny produktu: w tym ewentualne komentarze użytkownika na temat naszych produktów, pytania, recenzje itp.
(8) Informacje o korzystaniu z usługi: historia przeglądania i kliknięć.
(9) Informacje dotyczące zwrotów: imię i nazwisko, numer telefonu, adres odbioru oraz inne dane, które możesz nam przekazać.
(10) Informacje dotyczące obsługi klienta: dane kontaktowe (nazwisko, podany przez użytkownika numer telefonu i adres e-mail) oraz treść wiadomości e-mail, nagrania, zapisy czatu.
(11) Informacje o udziale w życiu Huawei Community: wszelkie informacje związane z uczestnictwem użytkownika w Huawei Community, w tym: jego pseudonim, punkty energii / poziomy członkostwa, historia nagród, kupony członkowskie przypisane do użytkownika, posty, komentarze, polubienia, udostępnienia, wiadomości prywatne, oddane głosy, zwyczaje takie jak interakcje z osobami lub kontami oraz wszelkie inne informacje podawane doraźnie przez użytkownika w ramach uczestnictwa w działaniach związanych z nagradzaniem członkostwa, konkursami lub wydarzeniami na naszej stronie Huawei Community, w tym data urodzenia, informacje dotyczące tożsamości, wpisy użytkownika przesłane za pośrednictwem platform społecznościowych innych firm w związku z promocjami promowanymi i zarządzanymi przez Huawei Community
(12) Dane lokalizacyjne: informacje o lokalizacji, jeśli użytkownik udzieli na to zgody, pozwalające ustalić lokalizację użytkownika i informować go o usługach dostępnych w pobliżu.
(13) Dane niezbędne do dochodzenia roszczeń i obrony przed roszczeniami - może być to przykładowo kwota zadłużenia, informacje związane z konkretnym zamówieniem. Zakres przetwarzanych przez nas danych może się każdorazowo zmieniać w zależności od przedmiotu roszczenia.
2. W jaki sposób wykorzystujemy dane użytkownika
Zbieramy i przetwarzamy następujące dane w celu udostępniania użytkownikowi żądanych usług oraz realizowania zobowiązań wynikających z umowy lub z przepisów prawa. O ile w treści tego dokumentu nie stwierdzono inaczej, jeśli użytkownik nie zezwoli na zbieranie i przetwarzanie swoich danych osobowych lub ograniczy jego zakres, nie będzie mógł korzystać z odpowiednich usług lub ich części.
W jakim celu Huawei przetwarza Twoje dane osobowe?
Więcej szczegółowych informacji dotyczących przetwarzania Państwa danych osobowych znajdą Państwo w podsumowaniu znajdującym się poniżej tabeli
Jakie kategorie danych osobowych przetwarzamy w celu realizacji tego celu przetwarzania (w przypadku danych opcjonalnych, o ile takie dane zostały nam przekazane)?
Podstawa prawna przetwarzania.
logowanie przy użyciu Huawei ID oraz personalizacja treści
informacje związane z kontem HUAWEI ID, w tym zdjęcie profilowe, pseudonim, płeć
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na ułatwieniu użytkownikom korzystania z funkcjonalności strony internetowej oraz umożliwieniu im personalizacji treści tworzonych w ramach Huawei Community
powiadomienie o ponownej dostępności produktu, który aktualnie nie jest dostępny
adres e-mail
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b RODO niezbędność do zawarcia i wykonania umowy
dokonanie zakupów online, w tym weryfikacja zamówienia
imię, nazwisko, adres e-mail, numer telefonu, adres zamieszkania, adres dostawy, firma, NIP, numer zamówienia i inne informacje o zamówieniu, identyfikator urządzenia, numer wysyłki i inne informacje o dostawie, informacje o płatności, imię i nazwisko właściciela, numer karty, data ważności karty, kod/kupon rabatowy
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b RODO niezbędność do zawarcia i wykonania umowy
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na ochronie praw Huawei
gwarancja i niezgodność towaru z umową/rekojmia
informacje przekazane obsłudze klienta, informacje o urządzeniu, informacje o koncie, identyfikator urządzenia
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. b RODO niezbędność do zawarcia i wykonania umowy
konkursy i promocje z nagrodami, udział w Huawei Community
informacje związane z kontem HUAWEI ID, dane kontaktowe (np. imię i nazwisko, adres, adres e-mail), wiek, wykluczenia, wcześniejsze uczestnictwo, zgłoszenia użytkownika przesłane za pośrednictwem platform społecznościowych stron trzecich
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na prowadzeniu akcji promocyjnych
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c RODO obowiązek prawny płatnika podatku dochodowego od osób fizycznych związany z przyznaniem nagrody
obsługa pytań klientów:
numer zamówienia, informacje podane obsłudze klienta
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na odpowiadaniu na kierowane zapytania i zarządzaniu naszymi relacjami z użytkownikami
recenzje produktów i odpowiedzi na pytania członków Huawei Community
dane konta użytkownika oraz recenzje produktów i zadawane pytania.
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na podnoszeniu jakości produktów i zarządzaniu naszymi relacjami z członkami Huawei Community
kontrola ryzyka, obsługa płatności spornych
identyfikator urządzenia, adres IP, dane konta, informacje o zamówieniach i informacje o płatnościach, UID użytkownika, nr przesyłki.
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na zapewnieniu bezpieczeństwa płatności, zapobieganiu kradzieżom, oszustwom, zagrożeniom finansowym i szkodliwym atakom na sieć
analiza i doskonalenie naszych usług, prognozowanie zarządzania zasobami, analiza księgowa oraz rozliczanie faktur od dostawców.
informacje o zamówieniach, informacje o płatnościach i informacje o urządzeniach
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na ocenie i doskonaleniu naszych usług,
dochodzenie roszczeń i obrona przed roszczeniami
dane niezbędne do dochodzenia roszczeń i obrony przed roszczeniami
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na ochronie praw Huawei
znajdowanie pobliskich punktów serwisowych i sklepów
informacje o lokalizacji użytkownika
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. a RODO zgoda
marketing usług i produktów Huawei
e-mail, historię aktywności oraz/lub numer telefonu, informacje o urządzeniu takie jak: model, rodzaj urządzenia – WAP, WEB, APP, system operacyjny, przeglądarka, rozdzielczość),
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. f RODO prawnie uzasadniony interes Huawei polegający na marketingu własnych produktów i usług. Niniejsza podstawa przetwarzania danych dotyczy jedynie przetwarzania danych osobowych w celach marketingowych na podstawie RODO.
wypełnianie zobowiązań prawnych, w tym wymogów podatkowych, księgowych
dane niezbędne do wypełnienia obowiązków prawnych
Art. 6 ust. 1 lit. c RODO obowiązek prawny
(1) Logowanie przy użyciu Huawei ID: jeśli użytkownik zdecyduje się na logowanie przy użyciu konta HUAWEI ID, przetwarzamy informacje o koncie HUAWEI ID w celu świadczenia usług związanych z logowaniem. HUAWEI ID, zdjęcie profilowe i pseudonim powiązany z kontem HUAWEI ID użytkownika będą wyświetlane w jego postach, wiadomościach, komentarzach, polubieniach i innych jego działaniach w Huawei Community. Jeśli użytkownik nie chce logować się za pomocą swojego HUAWEI ID, może korzystać z witryny i dokonywać zakupów jako gość
(2) Zakupy online: Informacje o zamówieniu, numer wysyłki, kod / kupon rabatowy i informacje o płatności są konieczne do przetwarzania płatności, wystawiania faktur, dostarczania zakupów pod wskazany adres i informowania użytkownika o postępie realizacji zamówienia. Ponadto, aby upewnić się, że zamówienie zostało zrealizowane i dokonać przeglądu urządzeń odesłanych przez użytkownika, rejestrujemy identyfikator urządzenia, informacje o dostawie i numer zamówienia, zanim towary zostaną wysłane. W przypadku zakupu produktów objętych
Programem Punktowym Huawei
dla konsumentów, system generuje punkty, które następnie zostaną przyznane Użytkownikowi zgodnie z końcową kwotą zamówienia. Punkty mogą zostać wykorzystane w postaci zniżek podczas kolejnych zakupów.
(3) Usługa naprawy gwarancyjnej i serwisu pogwarancyjnego, realizacja obowiązków wynikających z niezgodności towaru z umową/rękojmi za wady produktu: aby sprawdzić, czy urządzenie jest objęte ważną gwarancją lub podlega niezgodności towaru z umową/rękojmi, oraz sprawdzać ceny części zamiennych i dokonywać napraw gwarancyjnych i pogwarancyjnych lub na podstawie niezgodności towaru z umową/rękojmi, przetwarzamy informacje przekazane o urządzeniu. Ponadto przetwarzamy informacje o koncie Huawei ID, identyfikator urządzenia i informacje przekazane obsłudze klienta, aby umożliwić użytkownikowi zdalne zamawianie, rezerwowanie i śledzenie napraw przez witrynę internetową lub przez nasze autoryzowane centra obsługi klienta, jak również odbieranie i dostarczanie urządzeń pod adresem domowym lub w ustalonym punkcie odbioru. W trakcie wykonywania usługi możemy przeprowadzić reset fabryczny urządzenia, a wszelkie dane przechowywane na urządzeniu mogą zostać usunięte.
(4) Obsługa pytań klientów:jeśli użytkownik nawiąże kontakt z naszą obsługą klienta w sprawie ceny, realizacji zamówień, promocji lub swoich praw i interesów, zazwyczaj konieczne jest podanie numeru odpowiedniego zamówienia. Będziemy zbierać informacje podane obsłudze klienta, aby informować użytkownika o wynikach lub postępie sprawy. Poza tym może być wymagane podanie innych informacji, zależnie od treści zapytania.
(5) Recenzje produktów i typowe pytania: Za pomocą naszej Platformy HUAWEI ID użytkownik może pozostawiać i publikować swoje recenzje produktów i pytania. Wymagane jest zalogowanie się, które umożliwia identyfikację komentującego. Będziemy przetwarzać dane konta użytkownika oraz recenzje produktów i zadawane pytania.
Jeżeli Użytkownik umieszcza w Serwisie jakiekolwiek dane osobowe innych osób (w tym ich imię i nazwisko, adres, numer telefonu lub adres e-mail), może to uczynić jedynie pod warunkiem nienaruszenia przepisów obowiązującego prawa i dóbr osobistych tych osób.
(6) Kontrola ryzyka związanego z oszustwem i z innymi zagrożeniami, obsługa płatności spornych: aby zapewnić bezpieczeństwo płatności, zapobiegać kradzieżom, oszustwom, zagrożeniom finansowym i szkodliwym atakom na sieć, ułatwić rozwiązanie sporu przez bank źródłowy płatności będziemy zbierać i przetwarzać identyfikator urządzenia, adres IP, dane konta, informacje o zamówieniach i informacje o płatnościach, UID użytkownika, nr przesyłki.
(7) Analiza i doskonalenie działalności: przetwarzamy informacje o zamówieniach, informacje o płatnościach i informacje o urządzeniach w celu oceny i doskonalenia naszych usług, prognozowania zarządzania zasobami, analizy księgowej oraz rozliczania faktur od naszych dostawców.
(8) Dochodzenie roszczeń i obrona przed roszczeniami wynikającymi z zawartej umowy lub związanych ze świadczeniem usług, w tym windykacja należności, prowadzenie postępowań sądowych, arbitrażowych i mediacyjnych. Będziemy przetwarzać dane niezbędne do zrealizowania tego celu.
(9) Znajdowanie pobliskich punktów serwisowych i sklepów: Podczas wyszukiwania pobliskich punktów serwisowych Huawei będziemy wykorzystywać informacje o lokalizacji użytkownika. Wspomniane informacje będą używane wyłącznie w celu określenia dokładnej lokalizacji sklepów, a po ich wykorzystaniu dane osobowe użytkownika nie będą przechowywane na naszych serwerach
(10) Marketing: przetwarzamy adres e-mail, historię aktywności oraz/lub numer telefonu, lub informacje o urządzeniu do celów marketingowych, w tym w ramach ankiet badających zadowolenie klientów, oraz do przesyłania informacji handlowych przez e-mail lub z użyciem narzędzi innych producentów. Jeśli uzyskaliśmy adres e-mail i/lub numer telefonu Użytkownika w związku ze sprzedażą towarów lub usług, możemy wykorzystać ten adres e-mail do bezpośredniej reklamy naszych podobnych towarów lub usług. W takim przypadku adres e-mail Użytkownika zostanie ujawniony naszemu dostawcy usług marketingowych i będzie przechowywany w Irlandii.
(11) Wypełnianie zobowiązań prawnych: będziemy również przetwarzać dane niezbędne do wypełnienia zobowiązań prawnych, w tym wymogów podatkowych i księgowych
Więcej informacji na temat korzystania z plików cookie zawierają nasze zasady stosowania
plików cookie
. Użytkownik może w każdej chwili wycofać swoją zgodę, przy czym nie wpłynie to na zgodność przetwarzania jego danych osobowych z prawem w okresie przed wycofaniem zgody. Więcej informacji na ten temat zawiera sekcja 5 niniejszej Polityki prywatności: Jakie użytkownik ma prawa i możliwości wyboru.
Cookie: Plik cookie to plik tekstowy zapisywany przez serwer internetowy na komputerze lub urządzeniu przenośnym. Pliki cookie są unikatowe dla używanej przeglądarki lub aplikacji mobilnej. Treść pliku cookie często składa się z identyfikatorów, nazw witryn internetowych oraz sekwencji liczb i znaków.
Wykorzystujemy informacje z niezbędnych plików cookie, aby umożliwić użytkownikowi poruszanie się po witrynie, a ponadto, za zgodą użytkownika, wykorzystujemy informacje z dodatkowych plików cookie do celów marketingowych i analitycznych. Więcej informacji na temat korzystania z plików cookie:
Informacje o plikach cookie
. Użytkownik może w każdej chwili wycofać swoją zgodę, przy czym nie wpłynie to na zgodność przetwarzania jego danych osobowych z prawem w okresie przed wycofaniem zgody. Więcej informacji o tym, jak należy to zrobić, zawiera sekcja 5 niniejszej Polityki prywatności: Jakie użytkownik ma prawa i możliwości wyboru.
3. W jaki sposób udostępniamy dane użytkownika
(1) Udostępnianie danych dostawcom usług: Korzystamy z usług wewnątrzgrupowych i zewnętrznych dostawców usług, w tym dostawców usług płatniczych, dostawców usług magazynowych, operatorów sklepów, agentów obsługi klienta i firm naprawczych. Będą oni mieli dostęp do Twoich danych osobowych tylko w zakresie wymaganym do wypełnienia swoich zobowiązań umownych wobec nas. Nasi usługodawcy zostali przez nas starannie wybrani są związani umową i nie będą przetwarzać Państwa danych osobowych w żadnym innym celu.
(2) Udostępnianie danych dostawców usług płatniczych. Udostępniamy Twoje dane osobowe dostawcom usług płatniczych, którzy współpracują z bankami, wydawcami kart płatniczych i innymi podmiotami w celu umożliwienia i ułatwienia płatności.
(3) Udostępnianie danych firmom należącym do grupy:aby sprawdzić, czy Twoje urządzenie jest objęte gwarancją, udostępnimy Twój numer IMEI/ numer seryjny (SN) i dowód zakupu naszej chińskiej firmie produkcyjnej Huawei Device Co., Ltd., która rejestruje datę aktywacji Twojego urządzenia. Udostępnimy informacje o Twoim zamówieniu firmie Huawei Device Co., Ltd., w celu kontroli jakości i oszustw. Udostępniamy pseudonim użytkownika, jego posty, komentarze i wiadomości prywatne na naszej Huawei Community, naszej firmie stowarzyszonej
Aspiegel
SE w Irlandii w celu wstępnego sprawdzania i skanowania treści. W celu rutynowej konserwacji i obsługi naszych systemów informatycznych, informacje o zamówieniach użytkowników będą udostępniane firmie Huawei Technologies Romania Co., Ltd. Będziemy również udostępniać informacje nie umożliwiające identyfikacji osoby, takie jak model urządzenia i uszkodzone części, firmie Huawei Device Co., Ltd., w celu prognozowania części zamiennych i rozliczania dostawców napraw. W celu udoskonalenia technologii usług AI firmy Huawei, na podstawie naszych uzasadnionych interesów udostępniamy Państwa zanonimizowane nagrania czatu AI Bot naszemu zespołowi AI w Huawei Device Co., Ltd.
(4) Wymogi wynikające z przepisów prawa: Huawei może udostępniać dane osobowe użytkownika, aby spełnić wymogi obowiązujących norm i przepisów prawa, na wezwanie organów regulacyjnych, sądów lub właściwych urzędów albo w celu zabezpieczenia swoich praw i interesów.
(5) Reorganizacja działalności: Dane osobowe użytkownika mogą też zostać ujawnione innym podmiotom z grupy Huawei lub innej spółce w związku z fuzją, przejęciem, sprzedażą aktywów (np. umowy o świadczenie usług) albo przekazaniem realizacji usługi.
(6) Dane osobowe użytkownika są przechowywane na terenie UE. Huawei przestrzega wszystkich obowiązujących wymogów prawnych, by chronić dane osobowe obywateli UE przekazywane poza EOG. Aby móc udostępniać dane w obrębie naszej grupy, stosujemy standardowe klauzule umowne UE lub udostępniamy dane do krajów wobec których została wydana decyzja stwierdzająca odpowiedni poziom ochrony danych w celu zapewnienia jednakowego poziomu ochrony danych osobowych użytkownika nawet w miejscach, gdzie przepisy UE nie mają bezpośredniego zastosowania.
4. Jak długo przechowujemy dane użytkownika
Nie będziemy przechowywać danych osobowych użytkownika dłużej, niż to jest konieczne dla dostarczenia naszych produktów i usług i dla zrealizowania celów określonych w tym dokumencie. Dotyczy to w szczególności następujących okresów przechowywania:
(1) Dane konta Huawei ID : dane konta Huawei ID będą przechowywane do czasu, gdy użytkownik wyrejestruje swoje konto, usługa zostanie anulowana albo konto użytkownika zostanie usunięte z innych przyczyn.
(2) Dane kontaktowe: dane kontaktowe będą przechowywane przez dwadzieścia cztery (24) miesiące od czasu ostatniej interakcji z nami.
(3) Informacje o zamówieniu: informacje o zamówieniu, w tym informacje mające znaczenie dla dochodzenia lub obrony przed aktualnymi lub potencjalnymi roszczeniami dotyczącymi zamówienia, będą przechowywane przez 6 lat od czasu złożenia zamówienia, aby zagwarantować zgodność z obowiązującymi normami i przepisami prawa.
(4) Informacje o płatności: informacje o płatności będą przechowywane do celów podatkowych przez 5 lat, licząc od końca roku kalendarzowego, w którym upłynął termin płatności podatku, oraz do celów rachunkowych przez 5 lat, licząc od początku roku następującego po roku obrotowym, którego dotyczy dowód księgowy. Nie przechowujemy wrażliwych danych dotyczących płatności, takich jak kod CVV.
(5) Dane osobowe niezbędne do wypełnienia pozostałych zobowiązań prawnych będziemy przechowywać przez okres wskazany w poszczególnych przepisach prawnych
(6) Recenzje produktów, recenzje, komentarze, pytania i opinie publikowane przez użytkownika na naszych stronach produktów będą widoczne pod pseudonimem w naszej witrynie lub będą publikowane w ramach naszej aplikacji w sposób uniemożliwiający przypisanie ich użytkownikowi. Pozostaną one widoczne publicznie, dopóki witryna, aplikacja lub odpowiedni produkt będą dostępne.
(7) Informacje o urządzeniu: informacje o urządzeniu będą przechowywane przez 24 miesiące od czasu ostatniego kontaktu z nami albo w powiązaniu z kontem Huawei ID, jeśli zostały podane przy rejestracji.
(8) Informacje podane obsłudze klienta: informacje podane obsłudze klienta będą przechowywane przez 24 miesiące od czasu zgłoszenia, aby ułatwić obsługę bieżących i ostatnich zgłoszeń.
(9) Wiadomości, komentarze, polubienia, wiadomości prywatne i głosy w ramach naszego forum Huawei Community będą przechowywane do czasu, gdy użytkownik usunie konto w Huawei Community albo w inny sposób usunie lub wycofa swoje wpisy.
W odniesieniu do niektórych z powyższych okresów przechowywania użytkownik może zażądać wcześniejszego usunięcia swoich danych, korzystając ze swoich praw do cofnięcia zgody lub złożenia sprzeciwu i do usunięcia danych zgodnie z opisem w sekcji 5 niniejszej Polityki prywatności: jakie użytkownik ma prawa i możliwości wyboru. Obsługa związanych z tym wniosków odbywa się zgodnie z obowiązującymi przepisami prawa.
(10) Informacje o karcie płatniczej: informacje o karcie płatniczej będą przechowywane do momentu ich usunięcia.
5. Jakie użytkownik ma prawa i możliwości wyboru
Prawo użytkownika
Opis
Jak skorzystać z prawa?
Prawo dostępu do danych (art. 15 RODO)
Użytkownik może zażądać potwierdzenia, czy jego dane osobowe są przetwarzane i, jeśli ma to zastosowanie, zażądać wydania kopii swoich danych osobowych, które przetwarzamy.
(1) Zaloguj się na stronie. Z rozwijanego menu w prawym górnym rogu wybierz „Moje konto”. W zakładce „Twoje dane” kliknij „Zobacz swoje dane”. Zostaniesz przeniesiony do panelu nawigacyjnego. W poszczególnych zakładkach możesz zobaczyć swoje dane dotyczące zamówień, adresów, punktów, kart płatniczych i innych informacji powiązanych z Twoim kontem.
(2)
Tutaj
znajdują się informacje o wykonywaniu praw osób, których dane dotyczą. .
Prawo do przenoszenia danych (art. 20 RODO)
Użytkownik może uzyskać określone, udostępnione nam przez siebie informacje w formacie możliwym do odczytu maszynowego. Dotyczy to jedynie danych osobowych przetwarzanych na podstawie zgody lub umowy.
Aby uzyskać kopię swoich danych osobowych w postaci elektronicznej:
(1) Zaloguj na swoje konto, następnie przejdź do zakładki Moje Konto > Dane osobowe > Profil. Następnie w sekcji Ochrona prywatności wybierz przycisk "Zażądaj dostępu do danych", aby uzyskać swoje dane osobowe.
(2)
Tutaj
znajdują się informacje o wykonywaniu praw osób, których dane dotyczą.
Prawo do usunięcia danych („prawo do bycia zapomnianym”) (art. 17 RODO)
W pewnych okolicznościach użytkownik może żądać usunięcia swoich danych.
(1) Zaloguj się na stronie. Z rozwijanego menu w prawym górnym rogu wybierz „Moje konto”. W zakładce „Twoje dane” kliknij „Zobacz swoje dane”. Zostaniesz przeniesiony do panelu nawigacyjnego. W poszczególnych zakładkach możesz zobaczyć i usunąć dane dotyczące adresów, zamówień, zwrotów, kart płatniczych i innych informacji powiązanych z Twoim kontem.
(2)
Tutaj
znajdują się informacje o wykonywaniu praw osób, których dane dotyczą.
Prawo do sprostowania danych
(art. 16 RODO)
Użytkownik ma prawo sprostować nieprawidłowe dane lub uzupełnić dane niekompletne.
(1) Zaloguj się na stronie. Z rozwijanego menu w prawym górnym rogu wybierz „Moje konto”. W zakładce „Twoje dane” kliknij „Zobacz swoje dane”. Zostaniesz przeniesiony do panelu nawigacyjnego. W poszczególnych zakładkach możesz zobaczyć i edytować dane dotyczące adresów i inne informacje powiązane z Twoim kontem.
(2)
Tutaj
znajdują się informacje o wykonywaniu praw osób, których dane dotyczą.
Wycofanie zgody
(art. 7 par. 3 RODO)
Użytkownik może wycofać swoją zgodę na przetwarzanie jego danych osobowych.
(1) Jeśli chcesz zrezygnować z otrzymywania komunikacji elektronicznej, możesz skorzystać z linku znajdującego się w stopce otrzymanych wiadomości e-mail.
(2) Jeśli chcesz usunąć informacje o karcie płatniczej, otwórz zakładkę Moje Konto, a następnie sekcję Karty płatnicze.
(3) W przypadku powiadomień należy przejść do ustawień przeglądarki, aby wycofać zgodę w odpowiedniej przeglądarce.
(4) Możesz skorzystać ze swojego prawa do wglądu do danych lub ich usunięcia
tutaj
Prawo do sprzeciwu
(art. 21 RODO)
Użytkownik może zgłosić sprzeciw wobec przetwarzania swoich danych w określonych celach, na przykład na potrzeby marketingu bezpośredniego.
(1) Zaloguj się na stronie. Z rozwijanego menu w prawym górnym rogu wybierz „Moje konto”. W zakładce „Moje konto” kliknij Karty płatnicze ażeby usunąć informacje dotyczące kart płatniczych.
(2) Swoje prawo do sprzeciwu można wykonać tutaj.
Prawo do ograniczenia przetwarzania
(art. 18 RODO)
W określonych okolicznościach użytkownik może żądać ograniczenia przetwarzania swoich danych osobowych.
Użytkownik ma prawo zażądać ograniczenia przetwarzania swoich danych
tutaj
w następujących przypadkach:
• Użytkownik zakwestionował prawidłowość swoich danych osobowych, a ich weryfikacja przez nas wymaga pewnego czasu.
• Dane użytkownika są przetwarzane bez podstawy prawnej, ale użytkownik nie życzy sobie ich usuwania.
• Użytkownik prowadzi lub zamierza prowadzić spór prawny i składa wniosek o wydłużenie terminu przechowywania jego danych w sytuacji, gdy dane już miałyby zostać usunięte.
• Wniosek użytkownika dotyczący sprzeciwu wobec przetwarzania danych oczekuje na naszą weryfikację.
Jeśli użytkownik chce skontaktować się z naszym inspektorem ochrony danych lub złożyć zażalenie albo pytanie co do sposobu przetwarzania swoich danych osobowych przez Huawei, prosimy o przesłanie zgłoszenia
tutaj
.
Kontakt z naszym inspektorem ochrony danych jest też możliwy pod adresem:
Adres:
DPO Office
Hansaallee 205
40549 Düsseldorf
Niemcy
Użytkownik może też złożyć skargę do Urzędu Ochrony Danych Osobowych (https://uodo.gov.pl/pl) lub do innego organu ochrony danych osobowych, w szczególności w państwie swojego zwykłego pobytu, swojego miejsca pracy lub miejsca popełnienia domniemanego naruszenia.
6. Aktualizacje niniejszej Polityki prywatności
Huawei zastrzega sobie prawo do aktualizacji tego dokumentu w każdej chwili. W przypadku aktualizacji powiadomimy użytkownika z wyprzedzeniem o wszelkich istotnych zmianach, które będą mieć wpływ na przetwarzanie jego danych osobowych. Użyjemy w tym celu wiadomości e-mail albo innej formy kontaktu bezpośredniego.
Najbardziej aktualna wersja tej Polityki prywatności znajduje się tutaj. Data ostatniej aktualizacji dokumentu jest zawsze oznaczona na początku.
WAŻNE:
Informacje na temat naszych zobowiązań w odniesieniu do innych produktów i usług zawierają osobne polityki prywatności dołączone do odpowiednich produktów i usług.
Opuszczasz stronę consumer.huawei.com
Po kliknięciu w link zostaniesz przeniesiony na zewnętrzną stronę. Firma Huawei nie jest odpowiedzialna za strony zewnętrzne oraz nie ich kontroluje.
Powrót
Kontynuuj
RCD (Rekomendowana Cena Detaliczna) oznacza cenę detaliczną produktów HUAWEI ustalaną przez ich producenta. Rekomendowana cena detaliczna służy wyłącznie do celów porównawczych.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.hotjar.com/legal/policies/privacy/:
Are you an agency specialized in UX, digital marketing, or growth? Join our
Partner Program
Close banner
Hotjar Logo
Products
Solutions
Pricing
Case studies
Resources
Contact Sales
Sign in
Get started
English
Language
Get started
Toggle navigation menu
Legal / Policies
Back to legal overview
Privacy Policy
Date: 17 January 2024
Version number: 7.1
Language
English
We will NEVER sell Your Personal Data to Third Parties.
Hotjar will only share or disclose Personal Data as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy applies to Personal Data processed by Hotjar Ltd. (“
Hotjar
”, “
We
”, “
Us
” and “
Our
”) when You visit
www.hotjar.com
in addition to any sub-pages that are integrated within it (the “
Site
”); and/or make use of Hotjar’s Platform.
This Privacy Policy explains what Personal Data We collect through Our Site and Platform, how and why We collect it, how We use and disclose the Personal Data We collect and information on how to exercise privacy rights over this Personal Data.
We have also included a section on the processing of Personal Data sent to Hotjar from visitors to a Hotjar Enabled Site.
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time but We will never do so in a manner that compromises Our commitment to respect the privacy of individuals. The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs Our practices for collecting, processing and disclosing Personal Data. We will provide notice via email to Our Customers and on this page of any material modifications to this Privacy Policy. Continued use of Our Site and/or Platform following the effective date of any modifications will constitute acceptance of the modified Agreement (this includes Our
Terms of Service
,
Data Processing Agreement
,
Acceptable Use Policy
and this Privacy Policy).
All capitalized terms in this Privacy Policy shall have the same meaning as defined in the
Terms of Service
and in the Applicable Law.
Information about Hotjar
Hotjar is a company headquartered in the European Union (EU) that provides Software as a Service (SaaS). Hotjar is a digital experience insights platform that provides visual behaviour insights, in-the-moment feedback, and 1:1 interviews, all in one place.
Personal Data Collected by Hotjar
The Personal Data We collect depends on whether the individual is:
A visitor to the Hotjar Site
A Customer or user (the “
User
”) of the Hotjar Platform
A Tester who signed up on the Hotjar Platform
Personal Data collected from a visitor of the Hotjar Site
This section applies to Personal Data Hotjar collects from visitors to the Hotjar Site (
hotjar.com
) or any of Our sub-sites or sub-domains (e.g.
help.hotjar.com
, etc.).
Any Personal Data provided by a visitor to Our Site will be used only as described in this Privacy Policy and Hotjar’s
Acceptable Use Policy
.
Usage Data
When someone visits the Hotjar Site, We may temporarily store the name of their internet service provider, IP address, the website they visited Us from, the parts of Our Site they visit, the date and duration of the visit, and information from the device (e.g. device type, operating system, screen resolution, language, country you are located in, and web browser type) used during their visit or other similar information that helps Us understand your behaviour on our Site. We process this usage data to facilitate access to Our Site (e.g. to adjust Our Site to the devices that are used). We may use this data to analyze, develop, improve, secure or optimize the use, function and performance of Our Sites, or to make sure We are reaching out to the right audience. Wherever possible, we will use usage data in an aggregated and/or anonymized form. Depending on the context, the legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(a) and Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Cookies
Cookies are small data files transferred onto computers or devices. Hotjar uses cookies to process information including standard internet log information and details of the visitor’s behavioral patterns upon visiting Our Site. This is done to:
operate Our Site;
provide visitors to Our Site with a better experience by providing Us with insights on how visitors use Our Site; and
for marketing purposes, as detailed below.
For more info about the cookies We make use of, please visit Our
Cookie Information page
.
Contacting Us
Visitors to Our Site have the opportunity to contact Us to ask Us questions, for example via a contact form, where We ask for contact information (e.g. name, email address etc.). We use this data solely in connection with answering the queries We receive.
If a visitor to Our Site receives emails from Us, We may use certain analytics tools, to capture data such as when the email is opened or when any links or banners in the email have been clicked. This data helps Us understand the effectiveness of Our communications and marketing campaigns.
The legal basis for this processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Personal Data collected from Hotjar’s Customers, Users and Testers
This section applies to Personal Data Hotjar collects from its Customers, Users and Testers when making use of Hotjar’s Platform.
When someone signs up for an account with Hotjar, contacts Our customer support for assistance, or subscribes to Our content or special offers, We may ask for additional Personal Data such as their name, email address and additional details about them or the organization they represent.
We will solely process this Personal Data to provide Our Platform in accordance with Article 6(1)(b) GDPR. If you are a User of Our Platform on behalf of a Hotjar Customer that has concluded this Agreement with Hotjar, the legal basis for Hotjar to process your Personal Data is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR. Please refer to Our
Terms of Service
for further details on signing up and using Our Platfor.
We temporarily store IP addresses of Customers, Users and Testers of Our Platform for associated performance metrics (i.e. data related to how well Our Platform performs) and to monitor and track application errors. We will never access these IP addresses without any operational or security need. We automatically delete these IP addresses within thirty (30) calendar days.The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR. We may use technical data (such as keypresses, timestamps, etc.) collected through the Platform to analyze, develop, improve or optimize the use, function and performance of Our Site, or to make sure we are reaching out to the right audience. Wherever possible, we will use usage data in an aggregated or anonymized form.
A Customer
may delete their Hotjar account
at any time. Users and Testers may delete their respective accounts through their account settings. After account deletion, We may retain Personal Data (in part or in whole) associated with the Customer, User or Tester to meet any regulatory and reporting requirements for the timeframes stipulated by law and to be able to address customer service issues. Any other Personal Data We were processing relating to Our Customer, Tester and/or Users of that Hotjar account will be deleted permanently within thirty (30) calendar days. This does not apply to any Personal Data collected as part of Customer research within the Engage Product. To maintian the quality of the research data, any research-related Personal Data may need to be kept for a reasonably required time.
We may use Personal Data and other Data about Our Customers, Users and/or Testers (including but not limited to demographic information, location information, information about the computer or device from which they access Our Platform) to create, wherever possible, anonymized and aggregated information and analytics. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
The information We collect from Our Customers, Users and/or Testers is disclosed only in accordance with the Agreement and the Applicable Law.
Personal Data collected from Engage Product Testers
THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE REGISTERED TESTERS OF OUR ENGAGE PRODUCT
When a Tester signs up to the Engage Product, we will ask them to share some Personal Data with Us to create a Tester profile. The Tester profile information will be revealed to Hotjar and Our Customers, who may invite you to usability study interviews ("
Interviews
"). The Engage Product has been built to connect Testers with the best-matched Customers for their Interviews. Better matches means happier Customers and more payouts for Testers. We analyse the data Testers provide Us with, along with the information about the Tester’s use of Our Platform, to suggest a good Interview match.
We collect and process Tester Personal Data to allow Testers to participate in Customer research, as well as for database management, managing contacts and sending messages, analytics, managing Our hosting and backend infrastructure, paying Testers for their service, Tester registration and authentication and displaying content from external platforms.
The data categories we will ask Testers to provide in order to build the Tester profile may include but are not limited to, name, age, country of residence, educational background, profession, marital status, phone number and other registration information. This information allows us to effectively match Testers with the right Customers. Testers may also optionally upload an avatar or enter their gender, but can remove this at any time. If a Tester deletes their account, their profile data will be removed too. Depending on the context, the legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(b) GDPR and Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
We will also collect information that relates to how Testers use Our Platform. The categories of Personal Data relating to this include but are not limited to timezone, broad location (town or district), web browser, operating system and the device used, referral sources, email engagement data, data on how you use the Engage Product (including last login date and frequency) and account signup date. This information allows Us to personalize the Engage Product to Testers’ needs and to improve Our Engage Product. We do not collect precise, real-time information about the location of a Tester’s device. We delete (or anonymize) such Tester Personal Data as soon as you cancel your account. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
On an entirely voluntary basis, Testers may choose to connect their social media account with their Tester profile. This will grant Us read-only access to their social media account and we will store their social media account ID, along with a secure 'access key' that these social media companies provide to Us. If Tester grants Us access, we may also process their email address that is associated with the social media account, name, profile picture, gender and age range, which we may use to enhance Tester profile data on the Engage Product. We use social media account data as a 'quality signal' to confirm that the Engage Product account belongs to a real person and therefore, sharing of social account data may affect the number of Interview invitations a Tester receives. We will never post content to a Tester’s social profile without their permission and we will never request or access their private messages on these accounts. Testers can choose to disconnect their social media accounts at any time, which will prevent Us from being able to access them. Social media account data will also be deleted if you choose to delete your Hotjar account. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(a) GDPR.
In order to be able to remunerate Our Testers we will process payment related information that Testers share with Us such as PayPal email address, residential address, etc.. We may also need to keep a history of payments made to Testers. This is needed to comply with accounting and legal rules. This data may be kept up to seven (7) years. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(b) GDPR.
Hotjar’s use of Personal Data
Access and Disclosure to Third Parties
We use a select number of trusted external service providers for certain technical data analysis, processing and/or storage offerings (e.g., IT and related services). These Third Party service providers are carefully selected and meet high data protection and security standards. We only share data with them that is required for the services offered and We contractually bind them to keep any information We share with them as confidential and to process Personal Data only according to Our instructions. The legal basis for such processing would be Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
In addition to services providers, other categories of Third Parties may include:
Vendors/public institutions.
To the extent that this is necessary in order to make use of certain services requiring special expertise (such as legal, accounting or auditing services) We may share Personal Data with vendors of such services or public institutions that offer them (e.g. courts). The legal basis of this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Disclosure in the Event of Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfers.
If We are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then Data may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract. The legal basis for such processing would be Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Other than the cases mentioned above, We will only transfer Personal Data to Third Parties without express consent in accordance with Article 6(1)(a) GDPR or if We are obliged to do so by statutory law or by instruction from a public authority or court as outlined in Our
Terms of Service
.
Communication Purposes
We may occasionally send notification emails about updates to Our product, legal documents, customer support or for marketing purposes. To the extent required by Applicable Law, We will only send such messages if We have obtained consent in accordance with Article 6(1)(a) GDPR. In all other cases, the legal basis of this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Except for cases where We are required to do so by law (e.g. notification of a data breach, providing you with important information about your account, updating our legal documents, etc.), recipients of Our communication shall have the opportunity to unsubscribe from receiving these messages free of charge. We process requests to be placed on do-not-contact lists as required by Applicable Law.
Marketing Purposes
We use Personal Data given to Us by Hotjar’s Customers, Users, Testers and/or visitors to Our Site to target advertisements to:
Hotjar’s Customers, Users, Testers and/or visitors to Our Site to keep them informed about Hotjar and any product changes we make; and
Potential new Customers or Testers that appear to have shared interests or similar demographics.
The legal basis of this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
We do this by sharing Personal Data with Third Party marketing platforms that have high privacy and confidentiality standards and which have gone through a legal and security review by Hotjar. This ensures that these Third Parties cannot do anything with the Personal Data We provide them other than use it for the express purpose of providing Us with the marketing services We contract them for.
This Personal Data is only shared with these Third Parties through secure and encrypted means. If you wish to opt out of this processing activity, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
with the subject line “Opt-Out of Marketing”.
Compliance and Protection
We may use Personal Data to (legal basis for the respective processing in parentheses):
protect Our, Our Customers’/Users’, Testers’, visitors’ to Our Site or Third Parties’ rights, privacy, safety or property including by making and defending legal claims (Article 6(1)(b), (c) or (f) GDPR);
audit Our internal processes for compliance with legal and contractual requirements and internal policies (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR);
enforce Our
Terms of Service
(Article 6(1)(b) or (f) GDPR);
protect, investigate and deter against fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR); and
comply with the Applicable Law, lawful requests and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas or requests from government authorities (Article 6(1)(c) or (f) GDPR).
Benchmarking
Hotjar reserves the right to use and retain Data in a de-identified and/or aggregated form to improve Our Site and/or Platform and for statistical and benchmarking purposes, including enabling comparisons within the same industry to enhance the insights collected through Our Site and Platform. Benchmarks look at all collected metrics and compare them to others of the same nature. These de-identified and/or aggregated benchmarks may be published and shared publicly within Our Platform or in the form of other content We publish which may show a summary of results for a certain category or question type.
No Data which can individually identify Our Customers, or their end-users, Our Users or Our Testers will ever be shown in this statistical or benchmark data.
The legal basis for aggregating/anonymizing this Personal Data is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Intra-group sharing of User and visitor Data
Hotjar is part of the Content Square SAS group (“
Contentsquare
”) which is headquartered in Paris, France. In the course of our normal operations, Hotjar may share Data (e.g. name and contact details, etc.) of Users of Hotjar accounts, Testers, and visitors of Our Site (hotjar.com) with Contentsquare.
The purpose of sharing this Data is to pursue synergies in sales and marketing, which is in both Hotjar’s and Contentsquare’s legitimate commercial interests. The legal basis of this Data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR. Hotjar and Contentsquare are jointly responsible for these processing activities (so-called joint controllership). If you would like more information in this regard or would like to exercise your rights as described in this Privacy Policy, please contact Us at dpo@hotjar.com.
Other Purposes with Your Consent
In some cases, We may ask you for consent to collect, use or share Personal Data for other purposes. For example, We may ask you for consent to send marketing emails where required by law or to post testimonials or endorsements. In such cases, there will always be the ability to deny or revoke consent if desired. The legal basis for the data processing is under Article 6(1)(a) GDPR.
Duration of Processing
Unless a different timeframe has been specifically stated in this Privacy Policy or in
Our Pricing Page,
Personal Data will be retained for as long as is necessary for the purpose(s) for which We originally collected it or to provide Our Platform, resolve disputes, establish legal defenses, conduct audits, pursue legitimate business purposes, and enforce Our Agreement. We may also retain information as required by Applicable Law.
International Transfers of Personal Data
In most cases, Personal Data We collect is stored in the EU. However, in some limited cases, customer information may be accessed from, or other Personal Data (e.g., email, etc.) may be transferred outside of the EU. These countries may have different data protection laws. Hotjar endeavors to ensure appropriate safeguards are in place requiring that Personal Data will remain protected. Hotjar has concluded Standard Contractual Clauses with entities who We share Personal Data with outside of the EU. Further details about this can be found in Our article on
Data Storage
.
Children’s Information
Hotjar’s Platform is not directed to children under 13 (or other age as required by local law), and We do not knowingly collect Personal Data from children. If you learn that your child has provided Us with Personal Data without your consent, you may contact Us at dpo@hotjar.com. If We learn that We have collected a child’s Personal Data in violation of Applicable Law, We will promptly take steps to investigate this, delete such information and, if applicable, terminate the child’s account. We will also make sure to have preventive measures in place for this not to happen again in the future.
Rights over Personal Data
If you are a visitor to Our Site or a Customer, User and/or Tester of Our Platform and We have collected Personal Data about you, you have a right to access and to be informed about what Personal Data is processed by Hotjar, a right to rectification/correction, erasure/anonymization and restriction of processing (subject to certain exceptions and other requirements prescribed by law). You also have the right to receive from Hotjar a structured, common and machine-readable format of Personal Data you provided Us.
When you have provided consent, you may withdraw it at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of the processing that was carried out prior to withdrawing it. Whenever you withdraw consent, you acknowledge and accept that this may have a negative influence on the quality of Our Site and/or Platform. Please be aware that when you withdraw consent, We may delete the Personal Data previously processed on the basis of your consent and will not be allowed to keep it further which will mean that it cannot be accessed, downloaded or otherwise secured by you.
In addition, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your respective data protection authority.
To protect your privacy, We take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request. We can only identify you via your email address and we can only adhere to your request and provide information if We have Personal Data about you through you having made contact with Us directly and/or you are using Our Site and/or Platform.
To protect your privacy, We will take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling any consumer request under the Applicable Law. When you make a request, We will ask you to provide sufficient information that allows Us to reasonably verify you are the person We collected Personal Data about or an authorized representative, which may include your email address.
If You are located in California…
This section only applies to Our processing of Personal Data as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA).
The CCPA provides California residents with the right to know what
Categories of Personal Data
Hotjar has collected about them and whether Hotjar disclosed that Personal Data for a business purpose (e.g. to a service provider) in the preceding twelve (12) months.
If you are a California resident and would like to exercise any of your rights under the CCPA, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
. We will process your request in accordance with the Applicable Laws.
Sales of Personal Information Under the CCPA.
For purposes of the CCPA, Hotjar does not “sell” Personal Data, nor do We have actual knowledge of any “sale” of Personal Data of minors under 16 years of age.
Non-Discrimination.
California residents will have the right to exercise the rights conferred to them by the CCPA.
Authorized Agent.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request under the CCPA. If applicable, you may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. To designate an authorized agent, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
.
If You are located in Brazil…
This section only applies to Our processing of Personal Data under the Brazilian
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
(LGPD).
In addition to the rights described above, you also have the right to:
access your Personal Data processed by Hotjar;
unless restricted by law, request information about the public and private entities with which We have shared your Personal Data;
oppose to the processing carried out; and/or
receive information about the possibility of not providing your consent and the consequences of such denial.
If you are a Brazilian resident or were in Brazil when your Personal Data was collected and would like to exercise any of your rights under the LGPD, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
. We will process your request in accordance with the Applicable Laws.
Personal Data collected from a visitor of a Hotjar Enabled Site
This section applies to Personal Data sent to Hotjar from Our Customers about visitors to their site using Our Platform (i.e. a Hotjar Enabled Site).
When an end-user visits a Hotjar Enabled Site, the Hotjar Enabled Site’s privacy policy will apply to the Personal Data collected and not this Privacy Policy.
This section should always be read in conjunction with the specific privacy policy of the Hotjar Enabled Site which will contain further details regarding the processing of your Personal Data by the Hotjar Enabled Site.
When making use of Our Platform, Our Customers are bound by Our Privacy Policy, Our
Terms of Service
, and Our
Acceptable Use Policy
. You can get more information about Hotjar by visiting
Our Site
.
If you are a visitor to a Hotjar Enabled Site, Hotjar may temporarily process your IP address so that We can ensure Our service is running smoothly and improve the quality of Our Platform. Any IP addresses We process are used exclusively for associated performance metrics (i.e. data related to how well Our Platform performs on the Hotjar Enable Site) and to monitor and track application errors. For this purpose, We may temporarily store your IP address with Hotjar’s
Sub-Processors
which are subject to strict obligations of confidentiality and will process it only according to Our instructions. We will never access these IP addresses without any operational or security need. We automatically delete any IP addresses We process or store within thirty (30) calendar days. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Some Hotjar Customers may have the ability to integrate Data they have collected through Our Platform with other end-user data they have in their possession (e.g. their customer information).
Depending on the web browser you use, it might be possible for you to disallow Hotjar from collecting Data when visiting a Hotjar Enabled Site. To discover if your web browser offers this functionality visit Our
Do Not Track page
.
Please note that We cannot respond to any requests from end-users of Hotjar Enabled Sites related to their Personal Data, including requests to provide, rectify or delete any end-user Personal Data. Any requests from end users of Hotjar Enabled Sites related to Customer Personal Data should be sent to the relevant Hotjar Customer.
Previous Versions of this Privacy Policy
Version 7.1 (
compare markup changes between version 7 and 7.1
)